Montana, session 2025, HB2.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Short title. [This act] may be cited as "The General Appropriations Act of 2025".
NEW SECTION. Section 2. First level expenditures. The agency and program appropriation tables in the legislative fiscal analyst narrative accompanying this bill, showing first level expenditures and funding
for the 2027 biennium, are adopted as legislative intent.
NEW SECTION. Section 3. Severability. If any section, subsection, sentence, clause, or phrase of [this act] is for any reason held unconstitutional, the decision does not affect the validity of the remaining
portions of [this act].
NEW SECTION. Section 4. Appropriation control. An appropriation item designated "Biennial" may be spent in either year of the biennium. An appropriation item designated "Restricted" may be used during
the biennium only for the purpose designated by its title and as presented to the Legislature. An appropriation item designated "One Time Only" or "OTO" may not be included in the present law base for the 2029 biennium.
The Office of Budget and Program Planning shall establish a separate appropriation on the statewide accounting, budgeting, and human resource system for any item designated "Biennial", "Restricted", "One Time Only",
or "OTO". The Office of Budget and Program Planning shall establish at least one appropriation on the statewide accounting, budgeting, and human resource system for any appropriation that appears as a separate line
item in [this act].
NEW SECTION. Section 5. Appropriation control. The Office of Budget and Program Planning shall establish a separate appropriation on the statewide accounting, budgeting, and human resource system
for the funding included in each Executive Branch agency's budget to pay fixed cost allocations for the State Information Technology Services Division of the Department of Administration. The appropriations must be
designated as restricted.
NEW SECTION. Section 6. Appropriation control. For any appropriation for the Legislative Audit Division Federal Single Audit contained in this act, the Office of Budget and Program Planning is authorized
to move the appropriation between agencies. Movement of appropriation authority must be based on actual audit hours worked by legislative auditors on the Federal Single Audit for any specific agency. The “Restricted”
and “Biennial” designation must be retained on all appropriations for the Legislative Audit Division Federal Single Audit.
NEW SECTION. Section 7. Program definition. As used in [this act], "program":
(1) has the same meaning as provided in 17-7-102;
(2) is consistent with the management and accountability structure established on the statewide accounting, budgeting, and human resource system; and
(3) is identified as a major subdivision of an agency ordinally numbered with an Arabic numeral.
NEW SECTION. Section 8. Personal services funding -- 2029 biennium. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), present law and new proposal funding budget requests for the 2027 biennium submitted
under Title 17, chapter 7, part 1, by each Executive, Judicial, and Legislative Branch agency must include funding of first level personal services separate from funding of other expenditures. The funding of first level
- BP - 1 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
personal services by fund or equivalent for each fiscal year must be shown at the fourth reporting level or equivalent in the budget request for the 2029 biennium submitted by November 1 to the legislative fiscal analyst
by the Office of Budget and Program Planning. For the purpose of developing the personal services budget for the 2029 biennium, legislatively authorized positions budgeted (PB) are the same as full-time equivalents
(FTE).
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) do not apply to the Montana University System.
NEW SECTION. Section 9. Totals not appropriations. The totals shown in [this act] are for informational purposes only and are not appropriations.
NEW SECTION. Section 10. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
NEW SECTION. Section 11. Appropriations. The following money is appropriated for the respective fiscal years:
- BP - 2 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
A. GENERAL GOVERNMENT
LEGISLATIVE BRANCH (11040)
1. Legislative Services Division (20)
18,507,922 238,739 0 0 0 18,746,661 16,463,770 230,020 0 0 0 16,693,790
2. Legislative Committees and Activities (21)
1,907,497 0 0 0 0 1,907,497 1,114,535 0 0 0 0 1,114,535
a. Section 5-20-301, MCA, School Funding Study (Restricted/OTO)
233,927 0 0 0 0 233,927 100,255 0 0 0 0 100,255
3. Legislature - Senate (25)
9,091 0 0 0 0 9,091 0 0 0 0 0 0
4. Legislature - House (26)
122,068 0 0 0 0 122,068 0 0 0 0 0 0
5. Financial and Data Analysis (27)
3,894,582 0 0 0 0 3,894,582 3,678,243 0 0 0 0 3,678,243
a. Pension Actuarial (OTO)
51,500 0 0 0 0 51,500 53,000 0 0 0 0 53,000
b. Analysis of Montana Budget Implications From Federal Action (Biennial/OTO)
50,000 0 0 0 0 50,000 50,000 0 0 0 0 50,000
- A - 1 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
6. Audit and Examination (28)
3,551,861 2,921,851 0 0 0 6,473,712 3,534,101 2,922,214 0 0 0 6,456,315
a. Hotline Cases and Other Contingencies (Biennial/OTO)
25,000 0 0 0 0 25,000 25,000 0 0 0 0 25,000
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
Total
28,353,448 3,160,590 0 0 0 31,514,038 25,018,904 3,152,234 0 0 0 28,171,138
All appropriations for the Legislative Branch are biennial.
It is the intent of the Legislature that Pension Actuarial not be included in the Legislative Fiscal Division’s budget request for the 2029 biennium.
Audit and Examination includes a one-time-only reduction of general fund of $469,568 in FY 2026 and $477,759 in FY 2027 and increase of state special revenue of $469,568 in FY 2026 and $477,759 in FY 2027
because of an anticipated temporary increase in the number of hours to complete the Federal Single Audit.
Audit and Examination includes a one-time-only increase of general fund of $132,165 in FY 2026 and $132,165 in FY 2027 and decrease of state special revenue of $132,165 in FY 2026 and $132,165 in FY 2027
because of proposed changes in information technology audits included in LC 4208. If LC 4208 is not passed and approved, then the increase in general fund and the decrease in state special revenue in FY 2026 and
FY 2027 is void.
The general fund appropriations in FY 2026 and FY 2027 for Hotline Cases and Other Contingencies are for contracted services necessary under section 5-13-305, MCA, relating to increased activities for hotline
cases and other contingencies.
Analysis of Montana Budget Implications From Federal Action is contingent on one of the following events occurring in either fiscal year of the 2027 biennium: (1) passage of a bill or other type of legislation from
either chamber of Congress or executive order that reduces anticipated federal revenues to Montana by more than $100 million in the 2027 biennium; (2) passage of a bill or other type of legislation by both chambers of
Congress or executive order that cancels previously enacted spending in a manner that reduces anticipated federal revenues to Montana by more than $50 million; or (3) passage of a bill or other type of legislation from
either chamber of Congress that reduces anticipated state general fund revenue by more than $100 million. This appropriation will be used for additional Legislative Finance Committee meetings and joint meetings with
appropriate interim committees and interim budget committees to analyze and prepare for changes to the Montana budget resulting from federal action.
- A - 2 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
If HB 100 is passed and approved, the Legislative Branch is increased by $116,855 general fund in FY 2027, and the Legislative Branch may increase positions budgeted authorized in HB 2 by 1.00 PB in FY 2027.
If HB 111 is passed and approved, the Legislative Branch is increased by $66,150 general fund in FY 2026 and $28,350 general fund in FY 2027.
If SB 237 is passed and approved, the Legislative Branch is increased by $1,693 general fund in FY 2027.
If SB 311 is passed and approved, the Legislative Branch is increased by $242,462 general fund in FY 2026 and $104,095 general fund in FY 2027, and the Legislative Branch may increase positions budgeted
authorized in HB 2 by 1.00 PB in FY 2026 and 1.00 PB in FY 2027.
CONSUMER COUNSEL (11120)
1. Administrative Program (01)
0 1,699,351 0 0 0 1,699,351 0 1,700,909 0 0 0 1,700,909
a. Caseload Contingency (Restricted/Biennial/OTO)
0 150,000 0 0 0 150,000 0 150,000 0 0 0 150,000
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
Total
0 1,849,351 0 0 0 1,849,351 0 1,850,909 0 0 0 1,850,909
GOVERNOR'S OFFICE (31010)
1. Executive Office Program (01)
3,730,253 0 0 0 0 3,730,253 3,733,092 0 0 0 0 3,733,092
2. Executive Residence Operations (02)
132,279 0 0 0 0 132,279 132,266 0 0 0 0 132,266
3. Office of Budget and Program Planning (04)
- A - 3 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
3,424,255 0 0 0 0 3,424,255 3,432,141 0 0 0 0 3,432,141
a. Recruitment and Retention Contingency Fund (Restricted)
5,300,000 3,800,000 2,500,000 1,300,000 0 12,900,000 5,300,000 3,800,000 2,500,000 1,300,000 0 12,900,000
0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0
b. Legislative Audit (Restricted/Biennial)
76,725 0 0 0 0 76,725 0 0 0 0 0 0
c. Legislative Audit Division Federal Single Audit (Restricted/Biennial/OTO)
102,869 51,760 79,332 52,843 0 286,804 0 0 0 0 0 0
4. Office of Indian Affairs (05)
234,287 50,000 0 0 0 284,287 234,722 50,000 0 0 0 284,722
5. Mental Disabilities Board of Visitors and Mental Health Ombudsman (20)
512,267 0 0 0 0 512,267 514,368 0 0 0 0 514,368
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
Total
13,512,935 3,901,760 2,579,332 1,352,843 0 21,346,870 13,346,589 3,850,000 2,500,000 1,300,000 0 20,996,589
8,212,935 101,760 79,332 52,843 8,446,870 8,046,589 50,000 0 0 8,096,589
Any appropriations from Recruitment and Retention Contingency Fund remaining in the Office of Budget and Program Planning at the end of the 2027 biennium are considered one-time-only appropriations for the
purpose of determining the base budget for the 2029 biennium.
Any appropriations from Recruitment and Retention Contingency Fund must be used to adjust base pay for HB 2 base positions.
- A - 4 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
COMMISSIONER OF POLITICAL PRACTICES (32020)
1. Administration Program (01)
953,627 0 0 0 0 953,627 951,774 0 0 0 0 951,774
a. Public Access to Lobbying Information PB (Restricted/Biennial/OTO)
115,963 0 0 0 0 115,963 113,163 0 0 0 0 113,163
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
Total
1,069,590 0 0 0 0 1,069,590 1,064,937 0 0 0 0 1,064,937
It is the intent of the Legislature that the Public Access to Lobbying Information PB line item be used to address Legislative Audit Division recommendations, including the hiring of a person to assist the commissioner
with exercising the office's audit authority and make other expenditures pursuant to the “Public Access to Lobbying Information” report published November 2024.
STATE AUDITOR'S OFFICE (34010)
1. Central Management (01)
0 2,861,464 0 0 0 2,861,464 0 2,925,006 0 0 0 2,925,006
a. Legislative Audit (Restricted/Biennial)
0 12,092 0 0 0 12,092 0 0 0 0 0 0
2. Insurance (03)
0 24,415,243 45,000,000 0 0 69,415,243 0 27,449,731 50,000,000 0 0 77,449,731
a. Legislative Audit (Restricted/Biennial)
0 39,246 0 0 0 39,246 0 0 0 0 0 0
- A - 5 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
b. Legislative Audit Division Federal Single Audit (Restricted/Biennial)
0 0 28,466 0 0 28,466 0 0 0 0 0 0
3. Securities (04)
0 1,613,297 0 0 0 1,613,297 0 1,614,375 0 0 0 1,614,375
a. Legislative Audit (Restricted/Biennial)
0 9,052 0 0 0 9,052 0 0 0 0 0 0
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
Total
0 28,950,394 45,028,466 0 0 73,978,860 0 31,989,112 50,000,000 0 0 81,989,112
If HB 607 is passed and approved, the State Auditor’s Office is increased by $507,712 general fund in FY 2027.
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE (58010)
1. Director's Office (01)
10,334,759 368,540 0 155,750 0 10,859,049 10,358,932 368,540 0 155,750 0 10,883,222
a. Property Tax Revision Implementation (Biennial)
187,928 0 0 0 0 187,928 187,041 0 0 0 0 187,041
2. Technology Services Division (02)
10,364,314 186,639 0 385,439 0 10,936,392 10,700,241 186,639 0 391,439 0 11,278,319
3. Alcoholic Beverage Control Division (03)
- A - 6 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
0 0 0 223,608,439 0 223,608,439 0 0 0 223,618,910 0 223,618,910
a. ABCD Overtime, Temp Staff and Termination Payouts (Biennial)
0 0 0 365,000 0 365,000 0 0 0 365,000 0 365,000
4. Cannabis Control Division (04)
0 97,480,622 0 0 0 97,480,622 0 97,479,897 0 0 0 97,479,897
a. CCD Contract Increase (Restricted/Biennial)
0 519,215 0 0 0 519,215 0 607,197 0 0 0 607,197
5. Information Management and Collections Division (05)
7,343,280 146,597 0 16,890 0 7,506,767 7,426,918 146,597 0 16,890 0 7,590,405
a. Property Tax Revision Implementation (Biennial)
56,000 0 0 0 0 56,000 171,600 0 0 0 0 171,600
6. Business and Income Taxes Division (07)
12,778,037 951,758 503,023 0 0 14,232,818 12,842,075 976,758 503,023 0 0 14,321,856
7. Property Assessment Division (08)
27,280,826 17,276 0 0 0 27,298,102 27,428,498 17,276 0 0 0 27,445,774
a. HB 154 - Property Tax Revision Implementation (Biennial)
0 0 0 0 0 0 1,097,143 0 0 0 0 1,097,143
b. HB 155 - Property Tax Revision Implementation (Biennial)
- A - 7 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
57,234 0 0 0 0 57,234 57,234 0 0 0 0 57,234
c. Property Tax Revision Implementation (Biennial)
1,031,740 0 0 0 0 1,031,740 1,728,640 0 0 0 0 1,728,640
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
Total
69,434,118 99,670,647 503,023 224,531,518 0 394,139,306 71,998,322 99,782,904 503,023 224,547,989 0 396,832,238
If HB 2 is passed and approved and contains (1) $514,870 in FY 2026 and $503,434 in FY 2027 and (2) 4.00 PB in FY 2026 and 4.00 PB in FY 2027 in the Cannabis Control Division of the Department of Revenue
for the purpose of increased compliance resources regarding new marijuana licensees being accepted by the Department of Revenue and a bill is passed that extends the date that new marijuana licensees may be
accepted by the Department of Revenue to July 1, 2027, or later pursuant to section 16-12-201, MCA, then: (1) state special revenue appropriations to the Cannabis Control Division of the Department of Revenue are
decreased by $514,870 in FY 2026 and $503,434 in FY 2027; and (2) PB for the division are decreased by 4.00 in FY 2026 and FY 2027.
If HB 231 is not passed and approved, then the appropriations for “Property Tax Revision Implementation” in the Director’s Office, Information Management and Collections Division, and Property Assessment
Division are void.
If HB 154 is not passed and approved, then the appropriations for HB 154 - Property Tax Revision Implementation are void.
If HB 155 is not passed and approved, then the appropriations for HB 155 - Property Tax Revision Implementation are void.
If HB 29 is passed and approved, the Department of Revenue is increased by $96,688 general fund in FY 2027, and the Department of Revenue may increase positions budgeted authorized in HB 2 by 1.00 in FY
2027.
If HB 920 is passed and approved, the Department of Revenue is increased by $20,000 general fund in FY 2026.
If SB 253 is passed and approved, the Department of Revenue is increased by $72,699 general fund in FY 2026 and $66,783 general fund in FY 2027, and the Department of Revenue may increase positions
budgeted authorized in HB 2 by 0.50 PB in FY 2026 and 0.50 PB in FY 2027.
If SB 337 is passed and approved, the Department of Revenue is increased by $57,632 general fund in FY 2026 and $55,467 general fund in FY 2027, and the Department of Revenue may increase positions
budgeted authorized in HB 2 by 0.50 PB in FY 2026 and 0.50 PB in FY 2027.
- A - 8 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
If SB 424 is passed and approved, the Department of Revenue is increased by $77,231 general fund in FY 2026 and $48,730 general fund in FY 2027, and the Department of Revenue may increase positions
budgeted authorized in HB 2 by 1.00 PB in FY 2026 and 0.50 PB in FY 2027.
If SB 321 is passed and approved, the Department of Revenue is increased by $116,211 general fund in FY 2027, and the Department of Revenue may increase positions budgeted authorized in HB 2 by 1.50 PB
in FY 2027.
DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION (61010)
1. Director's Office (01)
50,294,548 0 22,707 0 0 50,317,255 50,729,365 0 22,707 0 0 50,752,072
2. Governor Elect Program (02)
0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0
3. State Financial Services Division (03)
1,861,526 0 5,828 87,878 0 1,955,232 1,861,947 0 5,828 87,878 0 1,955,653
a. Legislative Audit (Restricted/Biennial)
1,155,726 0 0 0 0 1,155,726 0 0 0 0 0 0
4. Architecture and Engineering Division (04)
0 3,053,205 0 0 0 3,053,205 0 3,058,795 0 0 0 3,058,795
5. State Procurement Services Division (05)
1,439,976 604,999 0 0 0 2,044,975 1,441,171 602,778 0 0 0 2,043,949
6. State Information Technology Services Div (07)
250,000 0 0 0 0 250,000 250,000 0 0 0 0 250,000
- A - 9 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
7. Banking and Financial Institutions Division (14)
0 5,117,817 0 0 0 5,117,817 0 5,122,842 0 0 0 5,122,842
8. Montana State Lottery (15)
0 0 0 6,680,718 0 6,680,718 0 0 0 6,692,287 0 6,692,287
a. Legislative Audit (Restricted/Biennial)
0 0 0 155,430 0 155,430 0 0 0 0 0 0
9. State Human Resources Division (23)
2,404,105 0 0 0 0 2,404,105 2,403,753 0 0 0 0 2,403,753
10. Montana Tax Appeal Board (37)
797,780 0 0 0 0 797,780 799,046 0 0 0 0 799,046
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
Total
58,203,661 8,776,021 28,535 6,924,026 0 73,932,243 57,485,282 8,784,415 28,535 6,780,165 0 73,078,397
If the Montana State Lottery Division does not conduct a request for proposal to obtain its contract for gambling services the division’s proprietary authority will be reduced by $500,000 in both fiscal years of the 2027
biennium.
The Legislative Audit Division will conduct a performance audit in the 2027 biennium of the Montana State Lottery contract procurement process.
It is the intent of the Legislature in each fiscal year of the 2027 biennium that if the Department of Administration is not able to deliver draft statewide financial statements to the Legislative Auditor by November 30,
the Director of the Department of Administration shall make a written report to the Legislative Audit Committee explaining the reasons for any delay and identifying whether any specific agencies or component units have
not provided information to the department in a timely manner.
It is the intent of the Legislature that the gambling services contract require the new contract winner to pay up to $50,000 a year for problem gambling addiction services.
- A - 10 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
If [an act] is passed and approved to require the Board of Investments to operate as a fiduciary, then the State Financial Services Division’s general fund is increased by $87,878 in each fiscal year of the 2027
biennium and proprietary funds are decreased by the same amount in each fiscal year of the 2027 biennium.
If HB 722 is not passed and approved, general fund appropriations in the State Information Technology Services Division are reduced by $250,000 in FY 2026 and $250,000 in FY 2027.
If HB 632 is passed and approved, the Department of Administration is increased by $1,650 general fund in FY 2026 and $1,650 general fund in FY 2027.
If SB 5 is passed and approved, the Department of Administration is increased by $7,700 general fund in FY 2026 and $7,700 general fund in FY 2027.
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE (65010)
1. Business MT (51)
3,050,764 2,429,321 887,795 0 0 6,367,880 3,060,559 2,430,335 888,908 0 0 6,379,802
2. Brand MT (52)
0 210,157 0 0 0 210,157 0 210,157 0 0 0 210,157
3. Community MT (60)
2,072,125 4,899,938 8,287,648 0 0 15,259,711 2,077,630 4,905,079 8,290,146 0 0 15,272,855
4. Housing MT (74)
0 0 12,018,492 0 0 12,018,492 0 0 12,022,834 0 0 12,022,834
a. Legislative Audit Division Federal Single Audit (Restricted/Biennial)
0 0 95,379 0 0 95,379 0 0 0 0 0 0
5. Board of Horse Racing (78)
250,000 241,712 0 0 0 491,712 250,000 241,878 0 0 0 491,878
6. Montana Heritage Commission (80)
- A - 11 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
0 2,633,614 0 0 0 2,633,614 0 2,635,651 0 0 0 2,635,651
a. Capital Improvements (Biennial/OTO)
0 250,000 0 0 0 250,000 0 250,000 0 0 0 250,000
7. Director's Office (81)
1,071,853 8,975 600,000 0 0 1,680,828 1,082,820 8,975 600,000 0 0 1,691,795
a. Travel Expense Reimbursement (Restricted)
0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0
29,702 29,702
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
Total
6,444,742 10,673,717 21,889,314 0 0 39,007,773 6,471,009 10,682,075 21,801,888 0 0 38,954,972
6,474,444 39,037,475
All federal special revenue appropriations in the Housing MT Division are biennial.
It is the intent of the Legislature that no authority is expended for the Brand MT Division in the Department of Commerce.
It is the intent of the Legislature that the capital improvements authority in the Montana Heritage Commission will be used to replace and restore brickwork and water drainage in Reeder's Alley and stabilize,
weatherize, and restore the Grace Methodist Church in Virginia City. The Montana Heritage Commission will report quarterly to the Section A Interim Budget Committee on the progress of these projects.
If [an act] is not passed and approved that authorizes the accommodations tax state special revenue fund to be used for the capital improvements projects, then the capital improvements is void.
The Travel Expense Reimbursement line item is to reimburse travel expenses that were overpaid by employees in previous biennia.
- A - 12 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
If HB 182 is passed and approved, the Department of Commerce is increased by $95,650 one-time-only general fund in FY 2027, and the Department of Commerce may increase positions budgeted authorized in
HB 2 by 1.00 PB in FY 2026 and 1.00 PB in FY 2027.
If HB 313 is passed and approved, the Department of Commerce is increased by $54,123 one-time-only general fund in FY 2026 and $55,477 one-time-only general fund in FY 2027, and the Department of Commerce
may increase positions budgeted authorized in HB 2 by 0.50 PB in FY 2026 and 0.50 PB in FY 2027.
If SB 116 is passed and approved, the Department of Commerce is decreased by $3,798 state special revenue in FY 2026 and $6,330 state special revenue in FY 2027.
If SB 409 is passed and approved, the Department of Commerce is increased by $282,880 state special revenue in FY 2026 and $335,467 state special revenue in FY 2027.
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY (66020)
1. Workforce Services Division (01)
277,897 15,830,536 19,798,265 0 0 35,906,698 278,175 15,398,309 19,821,964 0 0 35,498,448
a. Career and Technical Education - HB 252
0 218,059 0 0 0 218,059 0 193,025 0 0 0 193,025
2. Unemployment Insurance Division (02)
0 7,918,103 11,372,013 0 0 19,290,116 0 7,907,740 11,416,006 0 0 19,323,746
3. Commissioner’s Office and Centralized Services Division (03)
344,885 783,287 602,216 0 0 1,730,388 346,126 784,051 603,844 0 0 1,734,021
a. Operations Resources (Biennial/OTO)
0 100,000 0 0 0 100,000 0 0 0 0 0 0
4. Employment Standards Division (05)
38,317 37,879,351 1,490,977 0 0 39,408,645 41,978 37,939,642 1,493,466 0 0 39,475,086
- A - 13 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
5. Office of Community Services (07)
466,777 295,000 4,045,224 0 0 4,807,001 467,026 295,000 4,045,977 0 0 4,808,003
6. Workers' Compensation Court (09)
0 726,421 0 0 0 726,421 0 727,178 0 0 0 727,178
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
Total
1,127,876 63,750,757 37,308,695 0 0 102,187,328 1,133,305 63,244,945 37,381,257 0 0 101,759,507
If HB 2 and HB 656 are not both passed and approved, then appropriations to the Employment Standards Division of the Department of Labor and Industry in HB 2 are to change as follows: general fund appropriations
to increase $1,859,421 in FY 2026 and increase $1,859,421 in FY 2027, and state special revenue appropriations to decrease $1,859,421 in FY 2026 and decrease $1,859,421 in FY 2027.
If HB 2 and HB 656 are not both passed and approved, then state special revenue appropriations in HB 2 for the Office of Community Services within the Department of Labor and Industry are to decrease $295,000
in FY 2026 and $295,000 in FY 2027.
If HB 2 and HB 656 are both passed and approved, then general fund appropriations in HB 2 for the Office of Community Services within the Department of Labor and Industry are to decrease $295,000 in FY 2026
and $295,000 in FY 2027.
If HB 2 and HB 656 are not both passed and approved, then appropriations to the Workforce Services Division of the Department of Labor and Industry in HB 2 are to change as follows: state special revenue
appropriations to decrease $525,000 in FY 2026 and decrease $525,000 in FY 2027, and federal special revenue appropriations to decrease $1,600,303 in FY 2026 and decrease $1,600,303 in FY 2027.
If HB 2 and HB 252 are not both passed and approved, then the appropriations for Career and Technical Education – HB 252 within the Workforce Services Division are void.
If HB 210 is passed and approved, the Department of Labor and Industry is increased by $18,000 state special revenue in FY 2026.
If HB 226 is passed and approved, the Department of Labor and Industry is increased by $23,599 state special revenue in FY 2026 and $20,799 state special revenue in FY 2027.
If HB 241 is passed and approved, the Department of Labor and Industry is increased by $13,080 state special revenue in FY 2026.
If HB 447 is passed and approved, the Department of Labor and Industry is increased by $13,080 state special revenue in FY 2026.
- A - 14 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
If HB 516 is passed and approved, the Department of Labor and Industry is increased by $500,000 state special revenue in FY 2026, and the Department of Labor and Industry shall decrease positions budgeted
authorized in HB 2 by 5.00 PB in FY 2026 and 5.00 PB in FY 2027.
If HB 686 is passed and approved, the Department of Labor and Industry is increased by $3,200 state special revenue in FY 2026 and $3,200 state special revenue in FY 2027.
If HB 718 and HB 656 are both passed and approved, the Department of Labor and Industry is increased by $510,773 state special revenue in FY 2026 and $502,373 in FY 2027, and the Department of Labor and
Industry may increase positions budgeted authorized in HB 2 by 3.00 PB in FY 2026 and 3.00 PB in FY 2027.
If HB 806 is passed and approved, the Department of Labor and Industry is increased by $20,200 state special revenue in FY 2026.
If HB 850 is passed and approved, the Department of Labor and Industry is increased by $38,500 state special revenue in FY 2026.
If SB 33 is passed and approved, the Department of Labor and Industry is increased by $91,829 state special revenue in FY 2026 and $90,429 in FY 2027, and the Department of Labor and Industry may increase
positions budgeted authorized in HB 2 by 1.00 PB in FY 2026 and 1.00 PB in FY 2027.
If SB 233 is passed and approved, the Department of Labor and Industry is increased by $13,080 state special revenue in FY 2026.
If SB 279 is passed and approved, the Department of Labor and Industry is increased by $13,080 state special revenue in FY 2026.
If SB 518 is passed and approved, the Department of Labor and Industry is increased by $58,600 state special revenue in FY 2026.
If SB 867 is passed and approved, the Department of Labor and Industry is increased by $29,000 state special revenue in FY 2026 and $29,000 state special revenue in FY 2027.
If HB 929 is passed and approved, the Department of Labor and Industry is increased by $20,200 state special revenue in FY 2026.
If SB 535 is passed and approved, the Department of Labor and Industry is increased by $13,080 state special revenue in FY 2026.
If SB 319 is passed and approved, the Department of Labor and Industry is increased by $18,100 state special revenue in FY 2026.
DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AFFAIRS (67010)
1. Director's Office (01)
1,324,407 0 710,730 0 0 2,035,137 1,308,095 0 712,021 0 0 2,020,116
2. Challenge Program (02)
- A - 15 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
1,517,224 0 4,708,416 0 0 6,225,640 1,515,910 0 4,704,916 0 0 6,220,826
3. Scholarship Program (03)
250,000 0 0 0 0 250,000 250,000 0 0 0 0 250,000
4. Starbase (04)
0 0 1,665,393 0 0 1,665,393 0 0 1,694,758 0 0 1,694,758
5. Army National Guard Program (12)
1,648,153 3,920 19,825,467 0 0 21,477,540 1,627,968 3,920 19,839,178 0 0 21,471,066
a. Legislative Audit Division Federal Single Audit (Restricted/Biennial)
10,546 0 31,640 0 0 42,186 0 0 0 0 0 0
b. Contracted Services
418,337 0 0 0 0 418,337 439,253 0 0 0 0 439,253
6. Air National Guard Program (13)
420,758 0 6,312,581 0 0 6,733,339 421,619 0 6,455,082 0 0 6,876,701
7. Disaster and Emergency Services (21)
2,125,167 204,756 16,718,790 0 0 19,048,713 2,128,221 204,756 16,722,892 0 0 19,055,869
a. Legislative Audit Division Federal Single Audit (Restricted/Biennial)
21,094 0 21,094 0 0 42,188 0 0 0 0 0 0
8. Veterans' Affairs Program (31)
- A - 16 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
3,594,634 1,342,204 0 0 0 4,936,838 3,645,085 1,296,026 0 0 0 4,941,111
a. Firearm Safe Storage (Restricted/Biennial/OTO)
150,000 0 0 0 0 150,000 150,000 0 0 0 0 150,000
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
Total
11,480,320 1,550,880 49,994,111 0 0 63,025,311 11,486,151 1,504,702 50,128,847 0 0 63,119,700
If LC 4259 is passed and approved and contains language for an exception in carryforward authority for this purpose, then any amount of the general fund appropriations for Contracted Services within the Army
National Guard Program, $418,337 in FY 2026 and $439,253 in FY 2027, that is unexpended at the close of each corresponding fiscal year must revert back to the general fund.
If HB 252 is passed and approved, the Department of Military Affairs is increased by $18,915 general fund in FY 2026 and $19,480 general fund in FY 2027.
If SB 327 is passed and approved, the Department of Military Affairs is increased by $706 state special revenue in FY 2026 and $1,306 state special revenue in FY 2027.
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
TOTAL SECTION A
189,626,690 222,284,117 157,331,476 232,808,387 0 802,050,670 188,004,499 224,841,296 162,343,550 232,628,154 0 807,817,499
184,326,690 218,484,117 154,831,476 231,508,387 789,150,670 182,704,499 221,041,296 159,843,550 231,328,154 794,917,499
184,356,392 789,180,372


- A - 17 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
B. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES (69010)
1. Disability Employment and Transitions (01)
7,399,204 2,230,477 22,740,941 0 0 32,370,622 8,017,777 2,275,628 22,772,292 0 0 33,065,697
2. Human and Community Services (02)
26,379,972 2,108,147 271,940,329 0 0 300,428,448 26,282,529 2,111,432 271,867,379 0 0 300,261,340
a. Office of Public Assistance Overtime HCSD (Restricted)
80,874 12,637 159,219 0 0 252,730 80,874 12,637 159,219 0 0 252,730
b. Funding for Medically Needy Personnel (Restricted/Biennial/OTO)
126,175 0 341,141 0 0 467,316 126,175 0 341,141 0 0 467,316
c. Increase Funding for After-School Programs (Restricted/Biennial/OTO)
0 0 1,000,000 0 0 1,000,000 0 0 1,000,000 0 0 1,000,000
d. Increase Funding to Entities Providing Child Mentorship Programs (Restricted/Biennial/OTO)
0 0 500,000 0 0 500,000 0 0 500,000 0 0 500,000
e. Increase Funding to Entities That Advocate for Children in Legal Settings (Restricted/Biennial/OTO)
0 0 500,000 0 0 500,000 0 0 500,000 0 0 500,000
f. Increase Funding to Food Banks (Restricted/Biennial/OTO)
0 0 1,000,000 0 0 1,000,000 0 0 1,000,000 0 0 1,000,000
- B - 1 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
3. Child and Family Services (03)
80,330,994 1,473,989 48,892,013 0 0 130,696,996 82,524,633 1,471,928 49,649,990 0 0 133,646,551
a. Holiday/Overtime/Differential CFSD (Restricted)
761,391 0 156,812 0 0 918,203 799,460 0 164,653 0 0 964,113
4. Director's Office (04)
5,475,520 3,246,761 7,419,042 0 0 16,141,323 5,486,235 3,247,629 7,430,161 0 0 16,164,025
5. Child Support Services (05)
3,701,750 363,458 8,592,111 0 0 12,657,319 3,710,021 363,458 8,608,166 0 0 12,681,645
6. Business and Financial Services (06)
5,111,691 1,566,262 7,153,553 0 0 13,831,506 5,150,765 1,569,911 7,186,170 0 0 13,906,846
a. Legislative Audit Division Federal Single Audit (Restricted/Biennial)
524,449 44,692 410,721 0 0 979,862 0 0 0 0 0 0
7. Public Health and Safety Division (07)
3,357,262 14,441,694 22,112,051 0 0 39,911,007 3,324,954 14,433,171 22,181,569 0 0 39,939,694
a. Tobacco Use Prevention Program Contingent Funding (OTO)
0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0
1,300,000 1,300,000 1,300,000 1,300,000
b. Tobacco Use Prevention Program Funding (OTO)
- B - 2 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0
1,000,000 1,000,000 1,000,000 1,000,000
8. Office of Inspector General (08)
2,774,769 1,040,990 6,181,460 0 0 9,997,219 2,783,228 1,041,199 6,191,511 0 0 10,015,938
9. Technology Services Division (09)
30,073,406 2,344,589 51,486,965 0 0 83,904,960 34,969,644 2,489,523 62,251,787 0 0 99,710,954
10. Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities (10)
150,594,574 34,151,260 356,346,186 0 0 541,092,020 162,952,201 33,982,845 377,423,600 0 0 574,358,646
a. BHSFG 04. Redefine and Reopen Evaluation and Diagnostic Clinics (Restricted)
0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0
50,000 50,000 1,000,000 1,000,000
b. Provide Medicaid Home Visiting for Individuals with SUD or SDMI (Restricted)
0 645,176 1,035,408 0 0 1,680,584 0 667,000 1,063,994 0 0 1,730,994
c. BHSFG 01. Reconfigure the Current 0208 Waiver Services Rates (Restricted/Biennial)
0 218,753 218,750 0 0 437,503 0 2,091,168 2,498,132 0 0 4,589,300
d. BHSFG 03. Service Delivery System for Complex Needs (Restricted/Biennial)
0 1,395,000 0 0 0 1,395,000 0 4,090,350 3,389,650 0 0 7,480,000
e. BHSFG 08. Implement a Care Transitions Program (Restricted/Biennial)
- B - 3 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
0 0 0 0 0 0 0 1,239,576 0 0 0 1,239,576
f. BHSFG 18. School-Based Behavioral Health Initiatives (Restricted/Biennial)
0 1,764,145 0 0 0 1,764,145 0 1,764,145 0 0 0 1,764,145
g. BHSFG 17. Redesign Rates for In-State Youth Residential Services (Restricted/Biennial/OTO)
0 75,000 75,000 0 0 150,000 0 1,247,516 2,003,764 0 0 3,251,280
h. BHSFG 19. BH and DD Workforce Incentivization (Restricted/Biennial/OTO)
0 7,715,000 0 0 0 7,715,000 0 565,000 0 0 0 565,000
i. BHSFG 22. Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinics (Restricted/Biennial/OTO)
0 0 0 0 0 0 0 8,436,984 31,924,371 0 0 40,361,355
j. BHSFG 9.1 988 Marketing Campaign (Restricted/Biennial/OTO)
0 500,000 0 0 0 500,000 0 500,000 0 0 0 500,000
k. Fund Mental Health Community Crisis Beds (Restricted/Biennial/OTO)
0 1,250,000 0 0 0 1,250,000 0 1,250,000 0 0 0 1,250,000
l. Increase Psychiatric Residential Treatment Facility Bed Capacity (Restricted/OTO)
0 1,237,000 0 0 0 1,237,000 0 0 0 0 0 0
m. BHSFG 06. Funding for Targeted Case Management (Restricted/Biennial)
0 355,273 125,000 0 0 480,273 0 1,105,273 125,000 0 0 1,230,273
11. Health Resources Division (11)
- B - 4 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
260,434,741 143,891,384 1,275,741,111 0 0 1,680,067,236 279,289,454 144,496,737 1,320,986,649 0 0 1,744,772,840
145,198,374 1,282,395,965 1,688,029,080 145,803,727 1,327,641,503 1,752,734,684
a. Outcome-Based Hospital Supplemental Payments (Restricted)
0 653,495 3,327,427 0 0 3,980,922 0 653,495 3,327,427 0 0 3,980,922
0 0 0 0 0 0
b. Supplemental Payments to Independent Critical Access Hospitals (Restricted)
0 653,495 3,327,427 0 0 3,980,922 0 653,495 3,327,427 0 0 3,980,922
0 0 0 0 0 0
c. Provider Rate Increases for Air Ambulance Providers
850,000 0 4,507,059 0 0 5,357,059 850,000 0 4,503,037 0 0 5,353,037
12. Medicaid and Health Services Management (12)
1,416,917 48,835 3,891,759 0 0 5,357,511 1,417,059 48,845 3,891,939 0 0 5,357,843
13. Operations Services Division (16)
894,189 671,275 1,271,159 0 0 2,836,623 896,792 671,458 1,274,256 0 0 2,842,506
14. Senior and Long-Term Care Services (22)
116,197,031 30,479,540 241,366,900 0 0 388,043,471 124,125,416 30,494,786 254,049,465 0 0 408,669,667
15. Early Childhood and Family Support (25)
21,244,229 3,847,507 78,446,815 0 0 103,538,551 21,924,647 3,847,660 78,575,649 0 0 104,347,956
- B - 5 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
16. Health Care Facilities (33)
69,913,540 18,424,042 15,245,122 0 0 103,582,704 70,099,337 18,462,367 15,970,233 0 0 104,531,937
a. Montana State Hospital Beds (OTO)
0 10,516,567 0 0 0 10,516,567 0 10,516,567 0 0 0 10,516,567
b. Facility Wage Increases (Restricted)
883,932 159,519 0 0 0 1,043,451 1,630,489 250,361 0 0 0 1,880,850
c. Facility Wage Standardization (Restricted)
721,044 0 0 0 0 721,044 721,044 0 0 0 0 721,044
d. Personal Services Funding for the Montana State Hospital (Restricted)
0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0
5,000,000 5,000,000 10,000,000 10,000,000
e. Overtime/Holiday/Differential IBC (Restricted/Biennial)
135,203 0 0 0 0 135,203 135,203 0 0 0 0 135,203
f. Overtime/Holiday/Differential MCDC (Restricted/Biennial)
0 65,964 0 0 0 65,964 0 65,964 0 0 0 65,964
g. Overtime/Holiday/Differential MHNCC (Restricted/Biennial)
177,041 0 0 0 0 177,041 177,041 0 0 0 0 177,041
h. Overtime/Holiday/Differential MSH (Restricted/Biennial)
- B - 6 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
495,473 0 0 0 0 495,473 495,473 0 0 0 0 495,473
i. Overtime/Holiday/Differential MVH (Restricted/Biennial)
0 137,190 69,459 0 0 206,649 0 137,190 69,459 0 0 206,649
j. Operational Costs for MHNCC D-Wing Repurposing and Licensing (Restricted/Biennial/OTO)
3,157,864 0 0 0 0 3,157,864 6,424,001 0 0 0 0 6,424,001
k. Operational Costs for MSH Grasslands - Continued Subacute Step-Down (Restricted/Biennial/OTO)
0 6,229,092 0 0 0 6,229,092 0 3,966,125 0 0 0 3,966,125
l. Student Loan Repayment Program (Restricted/Biennial/OTO)
0 1,500,000 0 0 0 1,500,000 0 1,500,000 0 0 0 1,500,000
m. Facility Operations (Restricted/OTO)
40,034,660 0 0 0 0 40,034,660 39,424,836 0 0 0 0 39,424,836
20,034,660 20,034,660 9,424,836 9,424,836
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
Total
833,247,895 295,458,208 2,435,580,940 0 0 3,564,287,043 883,819,288 301,721,423 2,566,208,090 0 0 3,751,748,801
818,247,895 297,808,208 3,566,637,043 863,819,288 305,021,423 3,755,048,801
3,551,637,043 3,735,048,801
- B - 7 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
The line-item BHSFG 22. Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinics (Restricted/Biennial/OTO) is void if a bill containing provisions for the implementation of the certified community behavioral health clinic
(CCBHC) model is not passed and approved.
The line-item Student Loan Repayment Program (Restricted/Biennial/OTO) is restricted to a student loan repayment program for nurses, licensed practical nurses, and psychiatrists at the Montana State Hospital or
other state-run facilities. It is the intent of the Legislature that these funds be prioritized for positions at the Montana State Hospital.
The line-item Increase Psychiatric Residential Treatment Facility Bed Capacity (Restricted/OTO) is restricted to grants for increasing psychiatric residential treatment facility bed capacity across the state of Montana
with the intention of prioritizing the youngest and highest-need kids.
It is the intent of the Legislature that the Tribal Relations Manager position be returned to the direct supervision of the director of the Department of Public Health and Human Services, that this position report directly
to the director, and that this position be located in Helena within department offices. It is the intent of the Legislature that this be done by June 30, 2025.
The line-item Montana State Hospital Beds (OTO) is contingent on passage of a bill that permits the use of state special revenue funds as provided in section 50-1-119, MCA, for expenditures for operating the
Montana State Hospital.
The line-item Supplemental Payments to Independent Critical Access Hospitals (Restricted) is restricted to payments to independent critical access hospitals.
The line-item Outcome-Based Hospital Supplemental Payments (Restricted) is restricted to expenditures by the Department of Public Health and Human Services for the purposes of providing incentive Medicaid
supplemental payments to hospitals that demonstrate exceptional patient-centered and efficiency outcomes, and related administrative expenses.
The line-item Tobacco Use Prevention Program Contingent Funding (OTO) is void in any fiscal year during which the Department of Public Health and Human Services receives federal tobacco control program
funding.
If HB 401 is passed and approved, the Department of Public Health and Human Services is increased by $7,942 general fund in FY 2026.
If HB 574 is passed and approved, the Department of Public Health and Human Services may increase positions budgeted authorized in HB 2 by 2.00 PB in FY 2026 and 2.00 PB in FY 2027.
If HB 585 is passed and approved, the Department of Public Health and Human Services is increased by $2,761,609 general fund and $6,205,177 federal special revenue in FY 2026 and $2,768,857 general fund
and $6,175,842 federal special revenue in FY 2027.
If HB 610 is passed and approved, the Department of Public Health and Human Services is increased by $4,872,084 general fund and $13,432,911 federal special revenue in FY 2026 and $5,263,880 general fund
and $14,451,596 federal special revenue in FY 2027.
- B - 8 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
If HB 850 is passed and approved, the Department of Public Health and Human Services is increased by $183,385 general fund and $576,253 federal special revenue as one-time-only in FY 2026 and $372,784
general fund and $1,166,588 federal special revenue as one-time-only in FY 2027.
If HB 851 is passed and approved, the Department of Public Health and Human Services is increased by $1,561,215 general fund and $362,486 state special revenue in FY 2026 and $2,534,722 general fund and
$530,299 state special revenue in FY 2027, and the Department of Public Health and Human Services may increase positions budgeted authorized in HB 2 by 22.00 PB in FY 2026 and 22.00 PB in FY 2027.
If HB 853 is passed and approved, the Department of Public Health and Human Services is increased by $1,344,589 state special revenue in FY 2026 and $1,344,589 state special revenue in FY 2027.
If HB 881 is passed and approved, the Department of Public Health and Human Services is increased by $527,591 general fund and $620,498 federal special revenue in FY 2026 and $552,858 general fund and
$580,592 federal special revenue in FY 2027.
If SB 72 is passed and approved, the Department of Public Health and Human Services is increased by $843,712 general fund and $1,412,170 federal special revenue in FY 2026 and $498,231 general fund and
$809,413 federal special revenue in FY 2027.
If SB 191 is passed and approved, the Department of Public Health and Human Services is increased by $13,564 general fund in FY 2026 and $13,564 general fund in FY 2027.
If SB 319 is passed and approved, the Department of Public Health and Human Services is increased by $117,627 general fund and $338,373 federal special revenue as one-time-only in FY 2027 and is restricted
to Medicaid benefits and claims for doula services.
If SB 524 is passed and approved, the Department of Public Health and Human Services is increased by $665,477 general fund and $326,865 federal special revenue in FY 2026 and $5,176,159 general fund and
$2,418,615 federal special revenue in FY 2027.
If SB 565 is passed and approved, the Department of Public Health and Human Services is increased by $127,098 general fund in FY 2026 and $124,616 general fund in FY 2027, and the Department of Public
Health and Human Services may increase positions budgeted authorized in HB 2 by 1.00 PB in FY 2026 and 1.00 PB in FY 2027.
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
TOTAL SECTION B
833,247,895 295,458,208 2,435,580,940 0 0 3,564,287,043 883,819,288 301,721,423 2,566,208,090 0 0 3,751,748,801
818,247,895 297,808,208 3,566,637,043 863,819,288 305,021,423 3,755,048,801
3,551,637,043 3,735,048,801
- B - 9 - HB 2


69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
C. NATURAL RESOURCES AND TRANSPORTATION
DEPARTMENT OF FISH, WILDLIFE, AND PARKS (52010)
1. Technical Services Division (01)
0 10,135,261 167,895 0 0 10,303,156 0 10,107,169 167,895 0 0 10,275,064
2. Fisheries Division (03)
0 11,003,401 13,587,765 0 0 24,591,166 0 11,024,858 13,616,094 0 0 24,640,952
a. SPA Coordination (OTO)
0 107,241 0 0 0 107,241 0 107,241 0 0 0 107,241
3. Enforcement Division (04)
0 17,035,890 46,226 0 0 17,082,116 0 16,680,217 46,226 0 0 16,726,443
4. Wildlife Division (05)
0 12,512,359 11,692,880 0 0 24,205,239 0 12,665,155 11,714,052 0 0 24,379,207
a. Equipment (Biennial/OTO)
0 286,000 0 0 0 286,000 0 0 0 0 0 0
5. Parks and Outdoor Recreation Division (06)
0 28,336,362 5,462,218 0 0 33,798,580 0 28,359,775 5,462,218 0 0 33,821,993
a. Recreational Equipment (Biennial/OTO)
0 149,500 0 0 0 149,500 0 0 0 0 0 0
- C - 1 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
b. AmeriCorps Operations Increase (OTO)
0 177,000 0 0 0 177,000 0 177,000 0 0 0 177,000
c. Fishing Access Weed Control and Riparian Habitat (Restricted/Biennial/OTO)
0 66,875 0 0 0 66,875 0 66,875 0 0 0 66,875
d. Fishing and Water Access Sites (Restricted/Biennial/OTO)
0 51,750 0 0 0 51,750 0 51,750 0 0 0 51,750
6. Communication and Education Division (08)
0 4,694,980 1,033,441 0 0 5,728,421 0 4,705,886 1,033,441 0 0 5,739,327
4,814,244 1,391,232 6,205,476 4,820,250 1,376,532 6,196,782
a. Publication Specialist (OTO)
0 50,472 0 0 0 50,472 0 50,472 0 0 0 50,472
7. Administration (09)
0 27,114,278 1,759,127 0 0 28,873,405 0 27,363,032 1,759,127 0 0 29,122,159
a. Legislative Audit Division Federal Single Audit (Restricted/Biennial)
0 48,819 0 0 0 48,819 0 0 0 0 0 0
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
Total
0 111,770,188 33,749,552 0 0 145,519,740 0 111,359,430 33,799,053 0 0 145,158,483
- C - 2 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
111,889,452 34,107,343 145,996,795 111,473,794 34,142,144 145,615,938
The Department of Fish, Wildlife, and Parks is authorized to adjust the appropriations between state special revenue and federal special revenue by like amounts in order to respond to increases or reductions in
annual federal funding received during the biennium.
The snowmobile trail groomer appropriation in the Parks and Outdoor Recreation Division of $300,000 a year is biennial.
The Department of Fish, Wildlife, and Parks shall report to the Environmental Quality Council and the Joint Interim Budget Committee for Natural Resources and Transportation by the first day of December of each
year of the 2027 Biennium on the actual habitat enhanced and actual areas treated for weeds.
If HB 145 is passed and approved, the Department of Fish, Wildlife, and Parks is increased by $7,201,710 state special revenue in FY 2026 and $7,201,710 state special revenue in FY 2027.
If HB 330 is passed and approved, the Department of Fish, Wildlife, and Parks is increased by $37,724 state special revenue in FY 2026 and $37,724 state special revenue in FY 2027.
If HB 568 is passed and approved, the Department of Fish, Wildlife, and Parks is increased by $120,000 state special revenue in FY 2026.
If HB 855 is passed and approved, the Department of Fish, Wildlife, and Parks is increased by $8,120 general fund in FY 2026.
If SB 165 is passed and approved, the Department of Fish, Wildlife, and Parks is increased by $380,835 state special revenue in FY 2026 and $380,835 state special revenue in FY 2027.
If SB 238 is passed and approved, the Department of Fish, Wildlife, and Parks is increased by $33,648 state special revenue in FY 2026 and $84,121 state special revenue in FY 2027.
DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY (53010)
1. Central Management Program (10)
1,872,582 2,697,560 873,770 0 0 5,443,912 1,879,601 2,697,560 874,551 0 0 5,451,712
a. Montana Environmental Policy Act, Streamlining Environmental Reviews (Restricted/Biennial/OTO)
100,000 0 0 0 0 100,000 100,000 0 0 0 0 100,000
2. Water Quality Division (20)
3,517,297 8,475,099 8,999,405 0 0 20,991,801 3,513,493 8,480,537 9,009,848 0 0 21,003,878
- C - 3 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
3. Waste Management and Remediation Division (40)
739,824 12,288,408 11,374,388 0 0 24,402,620 743,154 12,306,209 11,379,279 0 0 24,428,642
4. Air, Energy, and Mining Division (50)
2,156,311 12,563,818 5,177,273 0 0 19,897,402 2,156,389 12,580,751 5,183,150 0 0 19,920,290
5. Libby Asbestos Superfund Advisory Team (80)
0 488,686 0 0 0 488,686 0 488,686 0 0 0 488,686
6. Petroleum Tank Release Compensation Board (90)
0 934,793 0 0 0 934,793 0 935,052 0 0 0 935,052
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
Total
8,386,014 37,448,364 26,424,836 0 0 72,259,214 8,392,637 37,488,795 26,446,828 0 0 72,328,260
The Water Quality Division is authorized to decrease federal special revenue and increase state special revenue in the drinking water or water pollution control revolving loan programs by a like amount within the
administration account, when the amount of federal capitalization funds has been expended or when federal funds and bond proceeds will be used for other program purposes.
If HB 58 is not passed and approved, HB 2 state special revenue in the Air, Energy, and Mining Division is reduced by $500,000 in FY 2026 and $500,000 in FY 2027.
If HB 69 is not passed and approved, HB 2 state special revenue in the Air, Energy, and Mining Division is reduced by $200,000 in FY 2026 and $200,000 in FY 2027.
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION (54010)
1. General Operations Program (01)
0 41,843,028 1,579,990 0 0 43,423,018 0 41,178,599 1,581,788 0 0 42,760,387
- C - 4 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
a. Legislative Audit Division Federal Single Audit (Restricted/Biennial)
0 274,478 0 0 0 274,478 0 0 0 0 0 0
2. Highways and Engineering (02)
0 129,692,619 632,470,936 0 0 762,163,555 0 132,431,981 649,861,008 0 0 782,292,989
a. Construction Equipment Repair and Replacement (OTO)
0 1,020,895 0 0 0 1,020,895 0 1,020,895 0 0 0 1,020,895
3. Maintenance Program (03)
0 177,210,669 13,579,349 0 0 190,790,018 0 177,383,007 13,560,407 0 0 190,943,414
a. Permanent Variable Message Signs (OTO)
0 329,333 1,470,667 0 0 1,800,000 0 0 0 0 0 0
4. Motor Carrier Services (22)
0 10,786,656 5,225,615 0 0 16,012,271 0 10,812,264 5,233,466 0 0 16,045,730
5. Aeronautics Program (40)
0 2,108,538 1,388,812 0 0 3,497,350 0 2,114,784 1,388,880 0 0 3,503,664
6. Rail, Transit, and Planning (50)
0 17,078,019 59,001,240 0 0 76,079,259 0 15,717,604 50,787,289 0 0 66,504,893
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
Total
- C - 5 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
0 380,344,235 714,716,609 0 0 1,095,060,844 0 380,659,134 722,412,838 0 0 1,103,071,972
The Department of Transportation may adjust appropriations between state special revenue and federal special revenue funds if the total state special revenue authority by program is not increased by more than
10% of the total appropriations established by the Legislature.
All appropriations in the Department of Transportation are biennial.
DEPARTMENT OF LIVESTOCK (56030)
1. Centralized Services Division (01)
303,440 2,476,606 0 0 0 2,780,046 303,155 2,482,999 0 0 0 2,786,154
2. Animal Health Division (04)
4,378,829 2,705,356 2,293,665 0 0 9,377,850 4,385,441 2,708,149 2,296,494 0 0 9,390,084
a. New Construction Laboratory Expenses (Biennial/OTO)
0 863,048 0 0 0 863,048 0 0 0 0 0 0
b. State Milk Laboratory Instruments (Biennial/OTO)
200,400 0 0 0 0 200,400 0 0 0 0 0 0
3. Brands Enforcement Division (06)
0 5,044,198 0 0 0 5,044,198 0 5,056,729 0 0 0 5,056,729
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
Total
4,882,669 11,089,208 2,293,665 0 0 18,265,542 4,688,596 10,247,877 2,296,494 0 0 17,232,967
- C - 6 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES AND CONSERVATION (57060)
1. Centralized Services Division (21)
6,435,832 5,727,617 0 0 0 12,163,449 6,461,866 5,737,257 0 0 0 12,199,123
a. Legislative Audit Division Federal Single Audit (Restricted/Biennial)
43,038 15,674 0 0 0 58,712 0 0 0 0 0 0
2. Oil and Gas Conservation Division (22)
0 2,340,397 107,879 0 0 2,448,276 0 2,344,310 107,879 0 0 2,452,189
3. Conservation and Resource Development Division (23)
2,167,746 11,436,367 293,340 0 0 13,897,453 2,178,845 11,444,045 293,340 0 0 13,916,230
11,501,367 13,962,453 11,509,045 13,981,230
a. CARDD Infrastructure Staffing (Biennial/OTO)
90,000 90,000 0 0 0 180,000 90,000 90,000 0 0 0 180,000
b. Regional Water Authority Admin (OTO)
0 140,000 0 0 0 140,000 0 140,000 0 0 0 140,000
c. Resource Development Technical Support (OTO)
0 180,000 0 0 0 180,000 0 180,000 0 0 0 180,000
4. Water Resources Division (24)
16,606,455 12,652,818 292,279 0 0 29,551,552 16,690,467 12,661,305 292,279 0 0 29,644,051
- C - 7 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
a. SWP Safety and Reliability of State Projects (OTO)
130,000 0 0 0 0 130,000 130,000 0 0 0 0 130,000
b. State Water Project PB related to FERC Audit (OTO)
365,901 0 0 0 0 365,901 365,900 0 0 0 0 365,900
5. Forestry and Trust Lands (35)
17,453,975 23,698,198 1,429,435 0 0 42,581,608 17,510,517 23,759,404 1,429,435 0 0 42,699,356
a. Capital Assets/Equipment (OTO)
0 150,000 0 0 0 150,000 0 150,000 0 0 0 150,000
b. Modular Steel Bridge (OTO)
0 92,150 0 0 0 92,150 0 0 0 0 0 0
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
Total
43,292,947 56,523,221 2,122,933 0 0 101,939,101 43,427,595 56,506,321 2,122,933 0 0 102,056,849
56,588,221 102,004,101 56,571,321 102,121,849
During the 2027 biennium, the Department of Natural Resources and Conservation is authorized to decrease federal special revenue in the water pollution control and/or drinking water revolving fund loan programs
and increase state special revenue by a like amount within administration accounts when the amount of federal Environmental Protection Agency CAP grant funds allocated for administration of the grant have been
expended or federal funds and bond proceeds will be used for other program purposes as authorized in law providing for the distribution of funds.
During the 2027 biennium, up to $600,000 from the loan loss reserve account of the private loan program established in section 85-1-603, MCA, is appropriated to the Department of Natural Resources and
Conservation for the purchase of prior liens on property held as loan security as provided in section 85-1-615, MCA.
- C - 8 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
If LC 2159 is not passed and approved, state special revenue in the Water Resources Division is reduced by $1,000,000 in FY 2026 and $1,000,000 in FY 2027.
If HB 441 is passed and approved, the Department of Natural Resources and Conservation is increased by $820,187 general fund in FY 2026 and $830,902 general fund in FY 2027 and decreased by $807,902
state special revenue in FY 2026 and $807,902 in FY 2027.
If HB 681 is passed and approved, the Department of Natural Resources and Conservation is increased by $629,913 general fund in FY 2026 and $463,588 general fund in FY 2027, and the Department of Natural
Resources and Conservation may increase positions budgeted authorized in HB 2 by 5.00 PB in FY 2026 and 5.00 PB in FY 2027.
If SB 178 is passed and approved, the Department of Natural Resources and Conservation is increased by $107,175 general fund in FY 2026 and $81,075 general fund in FY 2027 and $16,015 state special revenue
in FY 2026 and $12,115 state special revenue in FY 2027. The Department of Natural Resources and Conservation may increase positions budgeted authorized in HB 2 by 1.00 PB in FY 2026 and 1.00 PB in FY 2027.
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE (62010)
1. Central Management Division (15)
425,244 1,716,277 260,578 157,961 0 2,560,060 431,780 1,716,277 260,578 157,961 0 2,566,596
2. Agricultural Sciences Division (30)
397,858 9,735,621 1,264,217 0 0 11,397,696 398,079 9,750,788 1,265,411 0 0 11,414,278
a. Analytical Lab Equipment (OTO)
0 0 0 0 0 0 0 519,400 41,600 0 0 561,000
b. Organic Program System (OTO)
0 45,000 0 0 0 45,000 0 0 0 0 0 0
c. Produce Digital Inspections (OTO)
0 87,500 0 0 0 87,500 0 0 0 0 0 0
d. Stationary Granulator Locations (OTO)
- C - 9 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
0 125,000 0 0 0 125,000 0 125,000 0 0 0 125,000
3. Agricultural Development Division (50)
264,997 7,273,099 295,743 478,586 0 8,312,425 265,065 7,274,964 295,743 481,997 0 8,317,769
a. Agriculture Development CRM System (OTO)
49,000 0 0 0 0 49,000 0 0 0 0 0 0
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
Total
1,137,099 18,982,497 1,820,538 636,547 0 22,576,681 1,094,924 19,386,429 1,863,332 639,958 0 22,984,643
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
TOTAL SECTION C
57,698,729 616,157,713 781,128,133 636,547 0 1,455,621,122 57,603,752 615,647,986 788,941,478 639,958 0 1,462,833,174
616,276,977 781,485,924 1,456,098,177 615,762,350 789,284,569 1,463,290,629
616,341,977 1,456,163,177 615,827,350 1,463,355,629

- C - 10 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
D. JUDICIAL BRANCH, LAW ENFORCEMENT, AND JUSTICE
JUDICIAL BRANCH (21100)
1. Supreme Court Operations (01)
23,454,690 781,200 378,800 0 0 24,614,690 24,028,566 781,200 378,800 0 0 25,188,566
24,327,788 25,487,788 24,901,813 26,061,813
a. Legislative Audit (Restricted/Biennial)
59,400 0 0 0 0 59,400 0 0 0 0 0 0
2. Law Library (03)
989,880 0 0 0 0 989,880 989,919 0 0 0 0 989,919
3. District Court Operations (04)
36,906,832 754,716 0 0 0 37,661,548 37,343,334 754,716 0 0 0 38,098,050
4. Water Court (05)
1,159,465 1,683,546 0 0 0 2,843,011 1,161,359 1,747,319 0 0 0 2,908,678
a. Water Court Digitization (Biennial/OTO)
0 400,000 0 0 0 400,000 0 0 0 0 0 0
5. Clerk of Court (06)
611,550 0 0 0 0 611,550 613,969 0 0 0 0 613,969
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
- D - 1 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
Total
63,181,817 3,619,462 378,800 0 0 67,180,079 64,137,147 3,283,235 378,800 0 0 67,799,182
64,054,915 68,053,177 65,010,394 68,672,429
On the hiring of two additional judges in Yellowstone County, it is the intent of the Legislature that district court judges in the 13th judicial district develop specialized court dockets.
If HB 516 is passed and approved, the Judicial Branch is increased by $726,421 state special revenue in FY 2026 and $727,178 state special revenue in FY 2027, and the Judicial Branch may increase positions
budgeted authorized in HB 2 by 5.00 PB in FY 2026 and 5.00 PB in FY 2027.
If SB 40 is passed and approved, the Judicial Branch is increased by $25,728 general fund in FY 2026 and $25,728 general fund in FY 2027.
If SB 318 is passed and approved, the Judicial Branch is increased by $30,619 general fund in FY 2026 and $30,619 general fund in FY 2027.
If SB 370 is passed and approved, the Judicial Branch is increased by $436,384 general fund in FY 2026 and $436,384 general fund in FY 2027.
DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE (41100)
1. Legal Services Division (01)
8,044,497 1,165,506 229,485 0 0 9,439,488 8,043,390 1,165,506 229,485 0 0 9,438,381
a. Litigation Funding (Restricted/Biennial)
1,000,000 0 0 0 0 1,000,000 1,000,000 0 0 0 0 1,000,000
b. NRDP New Claims Authority (Restricted/Biennial/OTO)
500,000 0 0 0 0 500,000 500,000 0 0 0 0 500,000
2. Montana Highway Patrol (03)
744,596 51,836,728 0 0 0 52,581,324 744,596 51,924,874 0 0 0 52,669,470
- D - 2 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
2,032,394 52,235,378 54,267,772 2,032,394 52,323,524 54,355,918
a. Statewide Radio Loan Payoff (OTO)
0 6,000,000 0 0 0 6,000,000 0 0 0 0 0 0
3. Division of Criminal Investigation (05)
11,864,592 5,189,755 1,120,910 0 0 18,175,257 11,917,997 5,194,811 1,120,910 0 0 18,233,718
a. Funding Missing Indigenous Persons Task Force (OTO)
0 20,000 0 0 0 20,000 0 20,000 0 0 0 20,000
4. Gambling Control Division (07)
0 2,945,412 0 1,513,970 0 4,459,382 0 2,952,850 0 1,513,970 0 4,466,820
5. Forensic Science Division (08)
6,676,233 1,889,775 0 0 0 8,566,008 6,696,056 1,889,775 0 0 0 8,585,831
a. Provide Authority to Hire a Medical Examiner (Restricted/Biennial)
120,000 0 0 0 0 120,000 120,000 0 0 0 0 120,000
6. Motor Vehicle Division (09)
5,882,243 19,331,191 0 554,208 0 25,767,642 5,895,425 19,335,729 0 554,208 0 25,785,362
7. Central Services Division (10)
9,424,776 7,019,824 3,664 64,719 0 16,512,983 9,399,194 7,019,824 3,664 64,719 0 16,487,401
a. Legislative Audit (Restricted/Biennial)
- D - 3 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
98,406 0 0 0 0 98,406 0 0 0 0 0 0
8. Post Council (19)
0 622,897 0 0 0 622,897 0 622,897 0 0 0 622,897
9. Montana Law Enforcement Academy (20)
150,000 2,353,245 0 0 0 2,503,245 150,000 2,354,421 0 0 0 2,504,421
10. Board of Crime Control (21)
2,110,239 2,653,960 14,208,541 0 0 18,972,740 2,107,253 2,653,960 14,208,541 0 0 18,969,754
2,407,253 19,269,754
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
Total
46,615,582 101,028,293 15,562,600 2,132,897 0 165,339,372 46,573,911 95,134,647 15,562,600 2,132,897 0 159,404,055
47,903,380 101,426,943 167,025,820 47,861,709 95,533,297 161,090,503
48,161,709 161,390,503
If HB 85 is not passed and approved, the Montana Highway Patrol is increased by $2,000,000 general fund in FY 2026 and $2,000,000 general fund in FY 2027.
If SB 324 is not passed and approved, the Montana Highway Patrol is decreased by $3,298,615 $2,899,965 state special revenue in FY 2026 and FY 2027 and is increased by $2,698,615 $2,299,965 general fund
in FY 2026 and FY 2027. Additionally, if SB 324 is not passed and approved, the Montana Board of Crime Control is decreased by $2,000,000 state special revenue in FY 2026 and FY 2027 and is increased by $2,000,000
general fund in FY 2026 and FY 2027.
If SB 45 is passed and approved, the Department of Justice is increased by $161,631 general fund in FY 2026 and $156,631 general fund in FY 2027, and the Department of Justice may increase positions budgeted
authorized in HB 2 by 1.00 PB in FY 2026 and 1.00 PB in FY 2027.
- D - 4 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
If HB 341 is passed and approved, the Department of Justice is increased by $20,000 state special revenue in FY 2026.
If HB 512 is passed and approved, the Department of Justice is increased by $1,667 general fund in FY 2026.
If HB 849 is passed and approved, the Department of Justice is increased by $11,191 general fund and $1,778 state special revenue in FY 2026 and $3,556 state special revenue in FY 2027.
If SB 329 is passed and approved, the Department of Justice is increased by $16,400 general fund and $24,600 state special revenue in FY 2026.
If SB 412 is passed and approved, the Department of Justice is increased by $5,333 general fund and $8,000 state special revenue in FY 2026.
PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION (42010)
1. Public Service Regulation Program (01)
0 5,636,443 273,760 0 0 5,910,203 0 5,629,221 273,760 0 0 5,902,981
5,840,443 6,114,203 5,833,221 6,106,981
a. IRP Contract (OTO)
0 200,000 0 0 0 200,000 0 0 0 0 0 0
b. Legislative Audit (Restricted/Biennial)
0 44,550 0 0 0 44,550 0 0 0 0 0 0
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
Total
0 5,880,993 273,760 0 0 6,154,753 0 5,629,221 273,760 0 0 5,902,981
6,084,993 6,358,753 5,833,221 6,106,981
If HB 490 is passed and approved, the Public Service Commission is increased by $100,000 state special revenue in FY 2026 and $100,000 state special revenue in FY 2027.
- D - 5 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
OFFICE OF STATE PUBLIC DEFENDER (61080)
1. Public Defender Division (01)
26,998,354 0 0 0 0 26,998,354 27,152,519 0 0 0 0 27,152,519
2. Appellate Defender Division (02)
2,356,785 0 0 0 0 2,356,785 2,376,179 0 0 0 0 2,376,179
3. Conflict Defender Division (03)
3,855,478 0 0 0 0 3,855,478 3,869,997 0 0 0 0 3,869,997
4. Central Services Division (04)
18,367,574 0 0 0 0 18,367,574 18,685,197 0 0 0 0 18,685,197
a. Sustain Effective Public Defender Support - Agency Training Events (OTO)
150,000 0 0 0 0 150,000 150,000 0 0 0 0 150,000
b. Sustain Effective Public Defender Support - Client Communication/Access Tech (OTO)
75,000 0 0 0 0 75,000 75,000 0 0 0 0 75,000
c. Close Public Defender Shortfall (Restricted)
508,319 0 0 0 0 508,319 1,024,214 0 0 0 0 1,024,214
d. Sustain Existing Public Defender Services - Contracted Public Defender Rates (Restricted)
3,177,586 0 0 0 0 3,177,586 3,177,586 0 0 0 0 3,177,586
e. Sustain Effective Public Defender Support - AI/Data/Tech (Restricted/OTO)
- D - 6 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
200,000 0 0 0 0 200,000 200,000 0 0 0 0 200,000
f. Sustain Effective Public Defender Support - AI/Tech License (Restricted/OTO)
500,000 0 0 0 0 500,000 500,000 0 0 0 0 500,000
g. Sustain Effective Public Defender Support - Computer Purchase (Restricted/OTO)
171,600 0 0 0 0 171,600 31,200 0 0 0 0 31,200
h. Sustain Existing Public Defender Services - Contract Services Overage (Restricted/OTO)
3,275,000 0 0 0 0 3,275,000 3,275,000 0 0 0 0 3,275,000
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
Total
59,635,696 0 0 0 0 59,635,696 60,516,892 0 0 0 0 60,516,892
All appropriations in the Office of State Public Defender are biennial.
It is the intent of the Legislature that all management personnel who are members of the Montana Bar, except for the director, division administrators, and regional public defenders, perform at least 25% of the
average caseload of line attorneys.
If SB 19 is passed and approved and HB 863 does not add additional authority to the Office of State Public Defender, the Office of State Public Defender is increased by $264,810 general fund in FY 2026 and
$264,810 general fund in FY 2027.
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS (64010)
1. Director's Office and Central Services Division (01)
22,472,449 471,253 0 133,046 0 23,076,748 22,481,288 472,100 0 131,060 0 23,084,448
2. Public Safety Division (02)
- D - 7 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
155,525,424 1,868,963 0 0 0 157,394,387 156,048,032 1,868,963 0 0 0 157,916,995
a. Assistance for Youth Population (Restricted)
77,500 0 0 0 0 77,500 77,500 0 0 0 0 77,500
b. Increase County Jail Hold (Restricted)
3,082,644 0 0 0 0 3,082,644 3,144,297 0 0 0 0 3,144,297
c. Increase for Prevailing Wages at Crossroads (Restricted)
528,485 0 0 0 0 528,485 1,056,970 0 0 0 0 1,056,970
d. K-9 Program (Restricted)
478,801 0 0 0 0 478,801 447,800 0 0 0 0 447,800
e. Leased Vehicle Funding - Existing (Restricted)
82,325 0 0 0 0 82,325 82,325 0 0 0 0 82,325
f. Leased Vehicle Funding - New (Restricted)
101,838 0 0 0 0 101,838 101,838 0 0 0 0 101,838
g. Public Safety Security Equipment and Licenses (Restricted)
1,650,000 0 0 0 0 1,650,000 800,000 0 0 0 0 800,000
h. Secure Facility Equipment (Restricted)
461,000 0 0 0 0 461,000 461,000 0 0 0 0 461,000
i. Secure Facility Rate Increases (Restricted)
- D - 8 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
920,647 0 0 0 0 920,647 1,860,373 0 0 0 0 1,860,373
j. Vehicle Replacement (Restricted)
334,000 0 0 0 0 334,000 334,000 0 0 0 0 334,000
3. Rehabilitation and Programs Division (03)
118,915,832 4,760,709 0 0 0 123,676,541 119,850,027 4,760,863 0 0 0 124,610,890
a. 2.0% Rate Adjustment for Prerelease Centers (OTO)
608,043 0 0 0 0 608,043 1,238,557 0 0 0 0 1,238,557
b. Parenting Program (Restricted)
120,000 0 0 0 0 120,000 120,000 0 0 0 0 120,000
c. Respond to Increased Medical/Pharmacy Needs (Restricted)
432,282 0 0 0 0 432,282 417,282 0 0 0 0 417,282
4. Board of Pardons and Parole (04)
1,358,296 0 0 0 0 1,358,296 1,361,610 0 0 0 0 1,361,610
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
Total
307,149,566 7,100,925 0 133,046 0 314,383,537 309,882,899 7,101,926 0 131,060 0 317,115,885
All appropriations for the Director's Office/Central Services Division, Public Safety Division, and Rehabilitation and Programs Division are biennial.
- D - 9 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
If HB 186 is passed and approved, the Board of Pardons and Parole within the Department of Corrections is increased by $127,052 general fund in FY 2026 and $123,234 general fund in FY 2027, and the Board of
Pardons and Parole within the Department of Corrections may increase positions budgeted authorized in HB 2 by 1.00 PB in FY 2026 and 1.00 PB in FY 2027.
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
TOTAL SECTION D
476,582,661 117,629,673 16,215,160 2,265,943 0 612,693,437 481,110,849 111,149,029 16,215,160 2,263,957 0 610,738,995
477,870,459 118,232,323 614,583,885 482,398,647 111,751,679 612,629,443
478,743,557 615,456,983 482,698,647 612,929,443
483,571,894 613,802,690

- D - 10 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
E. EDUCATION
OFFICE OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION (35010)
1. State Level Activities (06)
15,230,202 343,482 18,323,889 0 0 33,897,573 18,097,064 343,717 18,334,934 0 0 36,775,715
343,334 33,897,425 343,559 36,775,557
a. Montana Digital Academy (Restricted)
3,035,431 0 0 0 0 3,035,431 3,105,545 0 0 0 0 3,105,545
b. Legislative Audit Division Federal Single Audit (Restricted/Biennial)
160,560 0 0 0 0 160,560 0 0 0 0 0 0
c. MT Indian Language Preservation (Restricted/Biennial)
750,000 0 0 0 0 750,000 750,000 0 0 0 0 750,000
d. STEM and Robotics (Restricted/Biennial)
50,000 0 0 0 0 50,000 50,000 0 0 0 0 50,000
e. Teacher Licensure System (Restricted/Biennial)
0 435,226 0 0 0 435,226 0 435,631 0 0 0 435,631
435,374 435,374 435,789 435,789
f. Database Modernization (Restricted/Biennial/OTO)
0 1,000,000 0 0 0 1,000,000 0 1,000,000 0 0 0 1,000,000
- E - 1 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
g. MTDA Frontier Learning Lab (Restricted/Biennial/OTO)
0 997,850 0 0 0 997,850 0 968,500 0 0 0 968,500
h. Revised Mathematics Content Standards (Restricted/Biennial/OTO)
2,500,000 0 0 0 0 2,500,000 2,500,000 0 0 0 0 2,500,000
i. High School Assessment (Restricted/OTO)
640,000 0 0 0 0 640,000 700,000 0 0 0 0 700,000
2. Local Education Activities (09)
0 1,500,000 164,414,575 0 0 165,914,575 0 1,500,000 164,414,575 0 0 165,914,575
a. Debt Service Assistance (Restricted)
0 16,000,000 0 0 0 16,000,000 1,093,501 16,000,000 0 0 0 17,093,501
b. Major Maintenance Aid (Restricted)
7,720,443 15,175,000 0 0 0 22,895,443 12,190,381 15,287,000 0 0 0 27,477,381
c. Advanced Opportunities (Restricted/Biennial)
4,000,000 0 0 0 0 4,000,000 4,000,000 0 0 0 0 4,000,000
d. Advancing Agricultural Education (Restricted/Biennial)
151,960 0 0 0 0 151,960 151,960 0 0 0 0 151,960
e. At-Risk Student Payment (Restricted/Biennial)
6,399,740 0 0 0 0 6,399,740 6,591,732 0 0 0 0 6,591,732
- E - 2 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
f. CTE Career and Technical Student Organizations (Restricted/Biennial)
903,000 0 0 0 0 903,000 903,000 0 0 0 0 903,000
g. CTE State Match (Restricted/Biennial)
1,500,000 0 0 0 0 1,500,000 1,500,000 0 0 0 0 1,500,000
h. Coal Mitigation (Restricted/Biennial)
1,693,274 0 0 0 0 1,693,274 1,693,274 0 0 0 0 1,693,274
i. Early Literacy (Restricted/Biennial)
1,500,000 0 0 0 0 1,500,000 1,500,000 0 0 0 0 1,500,000
j. Gifted and Talented (Restricted/Biennial)
350,000 0 0 0 0 350,000 350,000 0 0 0 0 350,000
k. In-State Treatment (Restricted/Biennial)
2,610,000 0 0 0 0 2,610,000 2,610,000 0 0 0 0 2,610,000
l. Indian Language Immersion (Restricted/Biennial)
264,970 0 0 0 0 264,970 269,970 0 0 0 0 269,970
m. K-12 BASE Aid (Restricted/Biennial)
528,458,517 500,927,832 0 0 0 1,029,386,349 590,366,074 504,581,502 0 0 0 1,094,947,576
n. National Board Certification (Restricted/Biennial)
178,588 0 0 0 0 178,588 178,588 0 0 0 0 178,588
- E - 3 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
o. Recruitment and Retention (Restricted/Biennial)
666,000 0 0 0 0 666,000 666,000 0 0 0 0 666,000
p. School Food (Restricted/Biennial)
695,954 0 0 0 0 695,954 695,954 0 0 0 0 695,954
q. School Lunch Funding (Restricted/Biennial)
300,000 0 0 0 0 300,000 300,000 0 0 0 0 300,000
r. School Safety (Restricted/Biennial)
100,000 0 0 0 0 100,000 100,000 0 0 0 0 100,000
s. State Tuition Payments (Restricted/Biennial)
249,911 0 0 0 0 249,911 249,911 0 0 0 0 249,911
t. Transformational Learning (Restricted/Biennial)
2,489,235 0 0 0 0 2,489,235 2,563,590 0 0 0 0 2,563,590
u. Transportation Aid (Restricted/Biennial)
11,998,552 0 0 0 0 11,998,552 11,998,552 0 0 0 0 11,998,552
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
Total
594,596,337 536,379,390 182,738,464 0 0 1,313,714,191 665,175,096 540,116,350 182,749,509 0 0 1,388,040,955
- E - 4 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
All revenue up to $1.5 million in the state traffic education account for distribution to schools under the provisions of sections 20-7-506 and 61-5-121, MCA, is appropriated for the 2027 biennium as provided in Title
20, chapter 7, part 5, MCA.
All appropriations for federal special revenue appropriations in State Level Activities and in Local Education Activities are biennial. All general fund appropriations in Local Education Activities are biennial except for
Debt Service Assistance and Major Maintenance Aid.
If HB 18 is not passed and approved, K-12 BASE Aid is increased by $11,116,000 general fund in FY 2026 and $10,393,000 general fund in FY 2027 and decreased by $11,116,000 state special revenue in FY
2026 and $10,393,000 state special revenue in FY 2027.
If HB 28 is passed and approved, K-12 BASE Aid is increased by $500,000 general fund in FY 2027.
If HB 140 is passed and approved, K-12 BASE Aid is increased by $100,000 general fund in FY 2027 and decreased by $100,000 state special revenue in FY 2027.
If HB 151 is passed and approved, K-12 BASE Aid is increased by $15,584 general fund in FY 2027.
If HB 168 is passed and approved, K-12 BASE Aid is increased by $3,728,257 general fund in FY 2027.
If HB 231 is not passed and approved, K-12 BASE Aid is decreased by $20,696,590 general fund in FY 2026 and $20,696,590 general fund in FY 2027 and increased by $20,696,590 state special revenue in FY
2026 and $20,696,590 state special revenue in FY 2027.
If HB 252 is not passed and approved, K-12 BASE Aid is decreased by $50,463,190 general fund in FY 2026 and $52,052,480 general fund in FY 2027.
If HB 252 is passed and approved, K-12 BASE Aid is increased by $1,562,379 general fund in FY 2026 and $3,446,012 general fund in FY 2027.
If HB 339 is passed and approved, K-12 BASE Aid is increased by $17,359,281 general fund in FY 2027.
If HB 462 is passed and approved and contains an appropriation for Revised Mathematics Content Standards, the Revised Mathematics Content Standards appropriation is void.
If HB 483 is passed and approved, Debt Service Assistance is decreased by $1,093,501 general fund in FY 2027 and K-12 BASE Aid is decreased by $30,651,425 general fund in FY 2027.
If HB 515 is not passed and approved and HB 483 is not passed and approved, Major Maintenance Aid is decreased by $1,234,007 general fund and $9,175,000 state special revenue in FY 2026 and $1,611,501
general fund and $9,287,000 state special revenue in FY 2027.
- E - 5 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
If HB 515 is not passed and approved and HB 483 is passed and approved, Major Maintenance Aid is decreased by $1,234,007 general fund and $9,175,000 state special revenue in FY 2026 and $5,866,576
general fund and $9,287,000 state special revenue in FY 2027.
If HB 515 is not passed and approved, Major Maintenance Aid is increased by $3,175,000 general fund in FY 2026 and $3,287,000 general fund in FY 2027 and decreased by $3,175,000 state special revenue in
FY 2026 and $3,287,000 state special revenue in FY 2027.
If HB 515 is passed and approved, Major Maintenance Aid is increased by $1,689,060 state special revenue in FY 2026 and decreased by $3,065,407 general fund in FY 2027.
If HB 551 is passed and approved and contains an appropriation for School Lunch Funding, the School Lunch Funding appropriation is void.
If HB 551 is passed and approved, there is appropriated in HB 2 a restricted and biennial appropriation of $167,882 general fund in FY 2026 and $167,225 general fund in FY 2027 for the purposes of HB 551.
If HB 567 is passed and approved, K-12 BASE Aid is increased by $2,000,000 general fund in FY 2027.
If HB 628 is passed and approved, K-12 BASE Aid is increased by $2,388,032 general fund in FY 2027.
If SB 278 is passed and approved, K-12 BASE Aid is increased by $175,320 general fund in FY 2027.
If SB 322 is not passed and approved, K-12 BASE Aid is decreased by $1,050,000 general fund in FY 2026 and $1,512,000 general fund in FY 2027 and increased by $1,050,000 state special revenue in FY 2026
and $1,512,000 state special revenue in FY 2027.
If SB 337 is passed and approved, K-12 BASE Aid is decreased by $14,900 general fund in FY 2026 and $353,900 state special revenue in FY 2027 and increased by $14,900 state special revenue in FY 2026 and
$353,900 general fund in FY 2027.
If SB 424 is passed and approved, K-12 BASE Aid is increased by $1,420,000 general fund in FY 2027 and decreased by $1,420,000 state special revenue in FY 2027.
If SB 534 is passed and approved, K-12 BASE Aid is increased by $102,000 general fund in FY 2027 and decreased by $102,000 state special revenue in FY 2027.
MTDA Frontier Learning Lab is contingent on the passage and approval of LC 958HB 864.
If LC 958HB 864 is not passed and approved, Database Modernization is decreased by $1,000,000 state special revenue in FY 2026 and $1,000,000 state special revenue in FY 2027 and increased by $1,000,000
general fund in FY 2026 and $1,000,000 general fund in FY 2027.
- E - 6 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
In accordance with the Montana Procurement Act and all applicable policies and procedures, the Department of Administration shall determine the most appropriate procurement method for the expenditure of the
Database Modernization appropriation and direct any necessary procurement actions.
The appropriation for In-State Treatment must be used only for the provision of educational programs to eligible children residing in qualifying facilities as defined in section 20-7-436, MCA.
BOARD OF PUBLIC EDUCATION (51010)
1. K-12 Education (01)
568,181 0 0 0 0 568,181 568,126 0 0 0 0 568,126
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
Total
568,181 0 0 0 0 568,181 568,126 0 0 0 0 568,126
COMMISSIONER OF HIGHER EDUCATION (51020)
1. Administration Program (01)
4,236,906 0 0 723,465 0 4,960,371 4,261,294 0 0 723,465 0 4,984,759
a. UM NAGPRA-Repatriation Support Team (OTO)
367,665 0 0 0 0 367,665 367,665 0 0 0 0 367,665
b. MSU Northern Meat Processing Program (Restricted/Biennial/OTO)
0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0
200,000 200,000
2. Student Assistance Program (02)
- E - 7 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
14,467,317 707,030 0 0 0 15,174,347 15,473,745 707,681 0 0 0 16,181,426
a. Montana Promise Grant (Biennial/OTO)
100,000 0 0 0 0 100,000 0 0 0 0 0 0
b. 1-2 Free (Restricted)
1,475,000 0 0 0 0 1,475,000 1,475,000 0 0 0 0 1,475,000
c. 1-2 Free CC's (Restricted)
600,000 0 0 0 0 600,000 600,000 0 0 0 0 600,000
d. 1-2 Free TCU's (Restricted)
100,000 0 0 0 0 100,000 100,000 0 0 0 0 100,000
e. Montana 10 (Restricted/OTO)
3,500,000 0 0 0 0 3,500,000 3,500,000 0 0 0 0 3,500,000
3. Community College Assistance (04)
17,980,804 0 0 0 0 17,980,804 18,767,899 0 0 0 0 18,767,899
18,489,590 18,489,590 19,294,951 19,294,951
17,980,804 17,980,804 18,767,899 18,767,899
4. Education Outreach and Diversity (06)
176,307 0 9,646,568 0 0 9,822,875 176,315 0 9,649,859 0 0 9,826,174
5. Work Force Development Program (08)
- E - 8 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
111,926 0 6,869,908 0 0 6,981,834 115,284 0 7,082,027 0 0 7,197,311
6. Appropriation Distribution (09)
234,578,325 36,344,425 0 0 0 270,922,750 233,481,468 36,802,425 0 0 0 270,283,893
a. Legislative Audit (Restricted/Biennial)
282,249 0 0 0 0 282,249 0 0 0 0 0 0
b. Single Audit Cost (Restricted/Biennial)
810,072 0 0 0 0 810,072 0 0 0 0 0 0
7. Agency Funds (10)
38,480,666 1,119,968 0 0 0 39,600,634 38,828,916 1,119,968 0 0 0 39,948,884
a. MAES Value-Added Initiative (OTO)
320,000 0 0 0 0 320,000 320,000 0 0 0 0 320,000
8. Tribal College Assistance Program (11)
918,400 0 0 0 0 918,400 918,400 0 0 0 0 918,400
a. Non-Beneficiary Increase (Restricted)
275,240 0 0 0 0 275,240 275,240 0 0 0 0 275,240
9. Guaranteed Student Loan Program (12)
0 0 2,324,902 0 0 2,324,902 0 0 2,324,940 0 0 2,324,940
10. Board of Regents-Administration (13)
- E - 9 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
74,576 0 0 0 0 74,576 74,576 0 0 0 0 74,576
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
Total
318,855,453 38,171,423 18,841,378 723,465 0 376,591,719 318,735,802 38,630,074 19,056,826 723,465 0 377,146,167
319,564,239 377,300,505 319,262,854 377,673,219
319,055,453 376,791,719 318,735,802 377,146,167
Items designated as OCHE Administration Program, Student Assistance Program, Educational Outreach and Diversity, Workforce Development Program, Appropriation Distribution, Guaranteed Student Loan, and
Board of Regents Administration are designated as biennial appropriations.
General fund money, state and federal special revenue, and proprietary fund revenue appropriated to the Board of Regents are included in all Montana University System programs. All other public funds received
by units of the Montana University System (other than plant funds appropriated in HB 5 relating to long-range building) are appropriated to the Board of Regents and may be expended under the provisions of section 17-
7-138(2), MCA. The Board of Regents shall allocate the appropriations to individual university system units, as defined in section 17-7-102(15), MCA, according to board policy.
The Montana University System, except for the Office of the Commissioner of Higher Education and the community colleges, shall provide the Office of Budget and Program Planning and the Legislative Fiscal
Division Banner access to the entire university system's information system, except for information pertaining to individual students and individual employees that is protected by Article II, sections 9 and 10, of the Montana
Constitution, section 20-25-515, MCA, or the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. 1232g.
The Montana University System shall provide the electronic data required for entering human resource data for the current unrestricted operating funds into the internet budgeting and reporting system. The salary
and benefit data provided must reflect approved Board of Regents operating budgets.
The commissioner may adjust the funding distribution between community colleges based on actual weighted FTE enrollment.
The community college FTE decrease funding factor is $6,000 for FY 2026 and $6,000 for FY 2027. The community college FTE increase funding factor is $8,000 for FY 2026 and $8,000 for FY 2027. The community
college weighting factors for the 2027 biennium are 1.50 for CTE FTE, 1.00 for general education FTE, 0.50 for early college FTE, and 0.25 for concurrent enrollment FTE.
The general fund appropriation for Community College Assistance is calculated to fund education in the community colleges for an estimated 1,911 resident FTE in FY 2026 and 1,996 in FY 2027. If actual weighted
resident FTE student enrollment in the community colleges is greater than the estimated number for the biennium, the community colleges must receive a reimbursement for the underpayment from the community college
- E - 10 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
FTE adjustment account. If actual weighted resident FTE student enrollment is less than the estimated numbers for the biennium, the community colleges shall pay a fee equal to the overpayment amount to be deposited
in the FTE adjustment account in accordance with section 20-15-328, MCA.
Total audit costs are estimated to be $358,500 for the community colleges for the biennium. Audit costs charged to the community colleges for the biennium may not exceed $60,500 for Flathead Valley Community
College, $188,000 for Miles Community College, and $110,000 for Dawson Community College. Total audit costs for UM - Missoula is $549,653 and MSU - Bozeman is $542,668.
If HB 864 is not passed and approved, the appropriation for Non-Beneficiary Increase is void.
SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF AND BLIND (51130)
1. Administration Program (01)
856,918 3,394 0 0 0 860,312 855,955 3,394 0 0 0 859,349
2. General Services (02)
713,927 0 0 0 0 713,927 714,765 0 0 0 0 714,765
3. Student Services (03)
2,185,688 0 34,729 0 0 2,220,417 2,190,419 0 34,729 0 0 2,225,148
4. Education (04)
6,076,014 302,341 172,080 0 0 6,550,435 6,105,880 302,341 172,080 0 0 6,580,301
a. Education Interpreters Professional Development (OTO)
61,000 0 0 0 0 61,000 61,000 0 0 0 0 61,000
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
Total
9,893,547 305,735 206,809 0 0 10,406,091 9,928,019 305,735 206,809 0 0 10,440,563
- E - 11 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
If HB 15 is passed and approved, the School for the Deaf and Blind is increased by $2,794 general fund in FY 2026 and $5,664 general fund in FY 2027.
If HB 151 is passed and approved, the School for the Deaf and Blind is increased by $63,132 general fund in FY 2026 and $81,168 general fund in FY 2027.
If HB 252 is passed and approved, the School for the Deaf and Blind is increased by $185,367 general fund in FY 2026 and $190,904 general fund in FY 2027.
MONTANA ARTS COUNCIL (51140)
1. Promotion of the Arts (01)
673,329 222,835 801,910 0 0 1,698,074 673,969 223,292 802,521 0 0 1,699,782
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
Total
673,329 222,835 801,910 0 0 1,698,074 673,969 223,292 802,521 0 0 1,699,782
All HB 2 federal funding appropriations for the Montana Arts Council are biennial appropriations.
MONTANA STATE LIBRARY (51150)
1. Central Services (01)
2,688,019 0 0 0 0 2,688,019 2,692,723 0 0 0 0 2,692,723
2. Patron and Local Library Development Services (02)
214,786 510,303 1,554,978 0 0 2,280,067 220,455 510,303 1,554,978 0 0 2,285,736
3. GIS, Data, and Information Services (03)
699,264 2,657,772 0 0 0 3,357,036 699,714 2,668,274 0 0 0 3,367,988
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
- E - 12 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
Total
3,602,069 3,168,075 1,554,978 0 0 8,325,122 3,612,892 3,178,577 1,554,978 0 0 8,346,447
MONTANA HISTORICAL SOCIETY (51170)
1. Administration Program (01)
262,222 2,556,939 141,812 373,343 0 3,334,316 283,700 2,556,842 141,812 373,473 0 3,355,827
a. Montana 250th Commission (Restricted/Biennial/OTO)
1,000,000 0 0 0 0 1,000,000 0 0 0 0 0 0
b. Temporary Relocation Rent (Restricted/OTO)
0 50,000 0 0 0 50,000 0 0 0 0 0 0
2. Library and Archives Program (02)
702,489 1,526,346 0 35,220 0 2,264,055 706,608 1,526,953 0 35,220 0 2,268,781
a. Contingency O&M Funds (OTO)
0 125,000 0 0 0 125,000 0 175,000 0 0 0 175,000
3. Museum Program (03)
364,575 1,479,361 0 3,079 0 1,847,015 366,869 1,479,674 0 3,079 0 1,849,622
a. Contingency O&M Funds (OTO)
0 125,000 0 0 0 125,000 0 175,000 0 0 0 175,000
4. Publications Program (04)
- E - 13 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
305,266 0 0 379,739 0 685,005 305,446 0 0 379,942 0 685,388
5. Outreach and Education Program (05)
338,836 387,132 0 26,980 0 752,948 339,345 387,361 0 26,980 0 753,686
6. State Historic Preservation Office Program (06)
0 0 871,323 224,565 0 1,095,888 0 0 873,422 224,565 0 1,097,987
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
Total
2,973,388 6,249,778 1,013,135 1,042,926 0 11,279,227 2,001,968 6,300,830 1,015,234 1,043,259 0 10,361,291
If HB 10 is not passed and approved with an appropriation for the Museum Systems Operation and Management project, then the Montana Historical Society appropriation is decreased by $96,296 state special
revenue in FY 2026 and $93,497 state special revenue in FY 2027 and the Montana Historical Society's Administration Program PB is decreased by 1.00 in FY 2026 and by 1.00 in FY 2027.
The Contingency O&M Funds appropriation may only be utilized for unforeseen and unbudgeted operations and maintenance costs outside of the scope of the agency's regular operating appropriation and must be
approved by the state budget director.
At least $500,000 of the Montana 250th Commission appropriation must be used for educational purposes.
If HB 641 is passed and approved, the Montana Historical Society is decreased by $2,167 state special revenue in FY 2026 and $2,083 state special revenue in FY 2027.
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
TOTAL SECTION E
931,162,304 584,497,236 205,156,674 1,766,391 0 1,722,582,605 1,000,695,872 588,754,858 205,385,877 1,766,724 0 1,796,603,331
931,871,090 1,723,291,391 1,001,222,924 1,797,130,383
931,362,304 1,722,782,605 1,000,695,872 1,796,603,331
- E - 14 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
State Federal State Federal
General Special Special Propri- General Special Special Propri-
Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total Fund Revenue Revenue etary Other Total
____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________ ____________
TOTAL STATE FUNDING
2,488,318,279 1,836,026,947 3,595,412,383 237,477,268 0 8,157,234,877 2,611,234,260 1,842,114,592 3,739,094,155 237,298,793 0 8,429,741,800
2,484,306,077 1,832,948,861 3,593,270,174 236,177,268 8,146,702,380 2,607,222,058 1,839,031,606 3,736,937,246 235,998,793 8,419,189,703
2,485,044,565 1,835,363,861 8,149,855,868 2,608,049,110 1,842,396,606 8,423,381,755
2,470,408,877 8,135,220,180 2,588,395,305 8,403,727,950

- E - 15 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
NEW SECTION. Section 11. Rates. It is the intent of the Legislature that any rate approved in this section as a “total allocation” may be increased by the cost calculated by the Office of Budget and Program
Planning for passage and approval of HB 13 or another bill affecting employee pay or benefits. Internal service fund type fees and charges established by the Legislature for the 2027 biennium in compliance with section
17-7-123(1)(f)(ii), MCA, are as follows:

DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE -- 5801
1. Information Management and Collections Division
Delinquent Account Collection Fee (maximum percent of amount collected) 6.00% 6.00%
DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION -- 6101
1. Director's Office
a. Management Services
Total Allocation of Costs $3,060,000 $3,070,000
Portion of unit for HR charges per FTE of user programs $1,320 $1,320
b. Chief Data Office
Total Allocation of Costs $500,000 $500,000
2. State Financial Services Division
a. SABHRS Finance and Budget Bureau
SABHRS Services Fee (total allocation of costs) $4,936,529 $5,035,259
b. Warrant Writer
Mailer $1.30 $1.30
Non-Mailer $0.60 $0.60
Emergency $15.00 $15.00
Duplicates $12.00 $12.00
Externals
Payroll $0.40 $0.40
University System $0.40 $0.40
Direct Deposit
Direct Deposit - Mailer $1.30 $1.30
Direct Deposit - No Advice Printed $0.20 $0.20
Unemployment Insurance
Mailer - Print Only $0.40 $0.40
Direct Deposit - No Advice Printed $0.10 $0.10
c. Statewide Cost Allocation Plan (SWCAP)
Statewide Cost Allocation Plan $4,5000,000 $4,5000,000
3. General Services Division
a. Facilities Management Bureau
- R - 1 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
Rent (per sq. ft.) $11.757 $11.790
Project Management - In-house 15% 15%
Project Management - Consultation Actual Cost Actual Cost
State Employee Access ID Card Actual Cost Actual Cost
b. Print and Mail Services
Internal Printing Cost + 25% Cost + 25%
Imaging (Scan) Cost + 25% Cost + 25%
Pick and Pack Fulfilment $1.00 $1.00
Desktop $75.00 $75.00
IT Programming $95.00 $95.00
Warrant Printing $0.30 $0.30
Inventory Mark Up 20.00% 20.00%
External Printing
Percent of Invoice Mark Up 8.80% 8.80%
Managed Print
Percent of Invoice Mark Up 15.90% 15.90%
Mail Preparation Cost + 25% Cost + 25%
Mail Operations Cost + 25% Cost + 25%
Interagency Mail (total allocation of costs) $397,635 $397,635
Postal Contract (Capitol) $38,976 $38,976
4. State Information Technology Services Division
Rates Maintained/Based on SITSD's Tech Budget Model
Operations of the Division 30-Day Working Capital Reserve
The 30-day working capital reserve used to establish State Information Technology Services Division rates for state agencies included in HB-2 must be based on personal services of $22,538,138 in FY 2026 and
$22,602,401 in FY 2027, operating expenses of $55,345,789 in FY 2026 and $55,392,605 in FY 2027, equipment and intangible assets of $370,861 in FY 2026 and $370,861 in FY 2027, and debt service of $1,170,000 in
FY 2026 and $1,170,000 in FY 2027. The State Information Technology Services Division shall report to the Legislative Finance Committee at its June 2025 meeting on how it implemented the state agency rates for
information technology services. The State Information Technology Services Division shall also report any adjustments to state agency rates for information technology or changes in appropriations of 5.0% or greater to
each expenditure category at each subsequent meeting of the Legislative Finance Committee.
5. Health Care and Benefits Division
a. Workers' Compensation Management Program
Administrative Fee $1.24 $1.23
6. State Human Resources Division
a. Enterprise Learning and Development
Program Fees (per FTE) $40.3206 $40.3206
Linked-In Learning (per FTE) $9.9830 $9.9830
b. Human Resources Information System Fee
- R - 2 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
Per payroll warrant advice per pay period $11.82 $12.39
7. Risk Management and Tort Defense
Auto Liability, Comprehensive, and Collision (total allocation to agencies) $1,820,313 $1,820,313
Aviation (total allocation to agencies) $169,961 $169,961
General Liability (total allocation to agencies) $13,151,738 $13,151,738
Property/Miscellaneous (total allocations to agencies) $9,009,000 $9,009,000
State agencies and universities will be billed half the insurance premium in the 2027 biennium by the Risk Management and Tort Defense Division (RMTD) due to an overage in the state insurance fund’s reserves.
Any insurance premium discounts that would have been realized in the 2027 biennium through participation in RMTD’s risk management/loss mitigation programs must be applied from each state agency’s or university’s
insurance premium holiday savings in a reasonable manner to avoid programmatic and funding shortfalls. RMTD has the authority to bill state agencies and universities an increased insurance premium if the agency or
university does not participate in risk management/loss mitigation activities during the 2027 biennium.
It is the intent of the Legislature that the Risk Management and Tort Defense Division’s proprietary fund partial rate holiday be one-time-only, and the full rate amount will be included in the 2029 biennium’s base
budget.
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE -- 6501
1. Board of Investments
For the purposes of [this act], the Legislature defines "rates" as the total collections necessary to operate the Board of Investments as follows:
Total Allocation $8,079,321 $8,079,321
If [an act] is passed and approved to require the Board of Investments to operate as a fiduciary, then the Board of Investments internal service rate is void.
2. Director's Office/Management Services
a. Management Services Indirect Charge Rate
State 19.89% 19.89%
Federal 19.89% 19.89%
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY -- 6602
1. Centralized Services Division
a. Cost Allocation Plan 9.50% 9.50%
b. Office of Legal Services (direct hourly rate)
Attorneys $132 $132
Paralegals and Other Services $97 $97
2. Technology Services Division
a. Application Services (per hour) $120 $120
b. Enterprise Services Rate (total amount allocated to divisions based on FTE) $3,546,886 $3,513,016
c. Direct Services Rate (pass through to divisions) Actual Cost Actual Cost
DEPARTMENT OF FISH, WILDLIFE, AND PARKS -- 5201
1. Vehicle and Aircraft Rates
In the Department of Fish, Wildlife, and Parks Motor Pool Program, if the price of gasoline goes above $5.00 per gallon, tier two rates may be charged if approved by the Office of Budget and Program Planning.
- R - 3 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
If the price of gasoline goes above $5.50 per gallon, tier three rates may be charged if approved by the Office of Budget and Program Planning.
Per Hour Rates
a. Two-Place Single Engine $454.00 $558.00
b. Four-Place Single Engine $454.00 $558.00
c. Turbine Helicopters $1,095.00 $1,102.00
Tier one
a. Class 210 (sedan)
Per Day Assigned $17.30 $17.30
Per Mile Operated $0.25 $0.25
b. Class 310 (van)
Per Day Assigned $23.30 $23.40
Per Mile Operated $0.31 $0.32
c. Class 410 (utility)
Per Day Assigned $19.00 $19.80
Per Mile Operated $0.40 $0.40
d. Class 610 (1/2 ton pickup)
Per Day Assigned $17.80 $18.40
Per Mile Operated $0.50 $0.51
e. Class 710 (3/4 ton pickup)
Per Day Assigned $17.90 $18.40
Per Mile Operated $0.58 $0.59
f. Class 1 Ton
Per Day Assigned $17.90 $18.40
Per Mile Operated $0.58 $0.59
Tier two (contingent $5.00/gallon)
a. Class 210 (sedan)
Per Day Assigned $17.30 $17.30
Per Mile Operated $0.25 $0.26
b. Class 310 (van)
Per Day Assigned $23.30 $23.40
Per Mile Operated $0.32 $0.33
c. Class 410 (utility)
Per Day Assigned $19.00 $19.80
Per Mile Operated $0.41 $0.41
- R - 4 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
d. Class 610 (1/2 ton pickup)
Per Day Assigned $17.80 $18.40
Per Mile Operated $0.52 $0.53
e. Class 710 (3/4 ton pickup)
Per Day Assigned $17.90 $18.40
Per Mile Operated $0.60 $0.61
f. Class 1 Ton
Per Day Assigned $17.90 $18.40
Per Mile Operated $0.60 $0.61
Tier three (contingent $5.50/gallon)
a. Class 210 (sedan)
Per Day Assigned $17.30 $17.30
Per Mile Operated $0.27 $0.27
b. Class 310 (van)
Per Day Assigned $23.30 $23.40
Per Mile Operated $0.34 $0.35
c. Class 410 (utility)
Per Day Assigned $19.00 $19.80
Per Mile Operated $0.43 $0.44
d. Class 610 (1/2 ton pickup)
Per Day Assigned $17.80 $18.40
Per Mile Operated $0.55 $0.56
e. Class 710 (3/4 ton pickup)
Per Day Assigned $17.90 $18.40
Per Mile Operated $0.64 $0.65
f. Class 1 Ton
Per Day Assigned $17.90 $18.40
Per Mile Operated $0.64 $0.65
2. Proprietary Maintenance Rate
Per Hour $76.50 $76.50
DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY -- 5301
Indirect Rate
a. Personal Services 28% 28%
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- 5401
1. State Motor Pool
- R - 5 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
In the State Motor Pool Program, if the price of gasoline goes above $3.97 per gallon, tier two rates may be charged if approved by the Office of Budget and Program Planning. If the price of gasoline goes above
$4.47 per gallon, tier three rates may be charged if approved by the Office of Budget and Program Planning.
Tier one
a. Class 02 (small utilities)
Per Hour Assigned $1.361 $1.432
Per Mile Operated $0.181 $0.181
b. Class 04 (large utilities)
Per Hour Assigned $1.283 $1.607
Per Mile Operated $0.279 $0.281
c. Class 05 (hybrid sedans)
Per Hour Assigned $1.292 $1.390
Per Mile Operated $0.137 $0.132
d. Class 06 (midsize compacts)
Per Hour Assigned $1.004 $1.025
Per Mile Operated $0.184 $0.186
e. Class 07 (small pickups)
Per Hour Assigned $0.528 $0.531
Per Mile Operated $0.291 $0.317
f. Class 11 (large pickups)
Per Hour Assigned $1.911 $1.884
Per Mile Operated $0.257 $0.257
g. Class 12 (vans – all types)
Per Hour Assigned $1.161 $1.236
Per Mile Operated $0.238 $0.239
Tier two (contingent $3.97/gallon)
a. Class 02 (small utilities)
Per Hour Assigned $1.361 $1.432
Per Mile Operated $0.202 $0.202
b. Class 04 (large utilities)
Per Hour Assigned $1.283 $1.607
Per Mile Operated $0.311 $0.312
c. Class 05 (hybrid sedans)
Per Hour Assigned $1.292 $1.390
Per Mile Operated $0.152 $0.146
d. Class 06 (midsize compacts)
- R - 6 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
Per Hour Assigned $1.004 $1.025
Per Mile Operated $0.204 $0.206
e. Class 07 (small pickups)
Per Hour Assigned $0.528 $0.531
Per Mile Operated $0.322 $0.349
f. Class 11 (large pickups)
Per Hour Assigned $1.911 $1.884
Per Mile Operated $0.289 $0.289
g. Class 12 (vans – all types)
Per Hour Assigned $1.161 $1.236
Per Mile Operated $0.264 $0.265
Tier three (contingent $4.47/gallon)
a. Class 02 (small utilities)
Per Hour Assigned $1.361 $1.432
Per Mile Operated $0.223 $0.223
b. Class 04 (large utilities)
Per Hour Assigned $1.283 $1.607
Per Mile Operated $0.343 $0.344
c. Class 05 (hybrid sedans)
Per Hour Assigned $1.292 $1.390
Per Mile Operated $0.166 $0.160
d. Class 06 (midsize compacts)
Per Hour Assigned $1.004 $1.025
Per Mile Operated $0.225 $0.226
e. Class 07 (small pickups)
Per Hour Assigned $0.528 $0.531
Per Mile Operated $0.354 $0.380
f. Class 11 (large pickups)
Per Hour Assigned $1.911 $1.884
Per Mile Operated $0.321 $0.321
g. Class 12 (vans – all types)
Per Hour Assigned $1.161 $1.236
Per Mile Operated $0.290 $0.292
2. Equipment Program
All of Program Operations 60-day working capital reserve
- R - 7 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
3. King Air Beechcraft
Per Hour $1,487.61 $1,538.66
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES AND CONSERVATION -- 5706
1. Air Operations Program.
a. Bell UH-1H $1,916.00 $1,916.00
b. Bell Jet Ranger $541.00 $541.00
c. Cessna 180 Series $216.00 $216.00
DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE -- 4110
1. Agency Legal Services
a. Senior Attorney (per hour) $200.00 $200.00
b. Associate Attorney (per hour) $160.00 $160.00
c. Paralegal (per hour) $100.00 $100.00
d. Legal Assistant (per hour) $75.00 $75.00
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS -- 6401
1. Labor Charge for Motor Vehicle Maintenance (per hour) $30.00 $30.00
2. Supply Fee as a Percentage of Actual Costs of Parts 10% 10%
3. Cook/Chill Rate -- Hot/Cold Base Tray Price (no delivery) $2.75 $2.85
4. Cook/Chill Rate -- Hot Base Tray Price $1.80 $1.90
5. Delivery Charge Per Mile $0.50 $0.50
6. Delivery Charge Per Hour $35.00 $35.00
7. Spoilage Percentage All Customers 5% 5%
8. Detention Center Trays $3.83 $3.93
9. Accessory Package $0.20 $0.20
10. Overhead Charge
a. Montana State Hospital 7% 7%
b. Montana State Prison 85% 85%
c. WATCh Program 8% 8%
11. Base Laundry Price per pound $0.73 $0.73
Delivery Charge per pound
a. Riverside Youth Correctional Facility $0.05 $0.05
b. Montana Law Enforcement Academy $0.15 $0.15
c. Montana Chemical Dependency Corp. $0.04 $0.04
d. Southwest Montana Veteran’s Home $0.04 $0.04
e. START Program $0.01 $0.01
f. University of Montana per shared round trip $67.50 $67.50
- R - 8 - HB 2

69th Legislature HB 0002.005
Fiscal 2026 Fiscal 2027
OFFICE OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- 3501
1. OPI Indirect Cost Pool
a. Unrestricted Rate 19% 19%
b. Restricted Rate 19% 19%
MONTANA STATE LIBRARY -- 5115
1. Natural Resource Information and Geographical Information Systems
Total Allocation of Costs $446,021 $446,021
- END -
- R - 9 - HB 2